

Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














Contract and Agreement Category List











































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog







Sample Contract Categories 

a

b

c

d

e

f

g

h

i

j

k

l

m

n

o

p

q

r

s

t

u

v

w

x

y

z


abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz


338k
		Delaware
	

278k
		New York
	

113k
		California
	

70k
		Texas
	

68k
		Agreement
	

62k
		Nevada
	

46k
		Florida
	

44k
		Maryland
	

40k
		Illinois
	

38k
		Employment Agreement
	

38k
		Washington
	

37k
		Amended And Restated
	

36k
		Massachusetts
	

34k
		New Jersey
	

33k
		Pennsylvania
	

28k
		Georgia
	

28k
		Colorado
	

26k
		Ohio
	

25k
		Minnesota
	

25k
		Virginia
	

21k
		North Carolina
	

20k
		Incentive Plan
	

19k
		Credit Agreement
	

19k
		Amendment
	

16k
		Connecticut
	

16k
		Michigan
	

15k
		Indiana
	

14k
		Registration Rights Agreement
	

14k
		Recitals
	

14k
		Tennessee
	

13k
		Arizona
	

13k
		Missouri
	

12k
		Purchase Agreement
	

12k
		Promissory Note
	

12k
		Indenture
	

11k
		Warrant
	

11k
		Louisiana
	

11k
		Kansas
	

11k
		Utah
	

11k
		Wisconsin
	

10k
		Oklahoma
	

9k
		Securities Purchase Agreement
	

9k
		Agreement And Plan Of Merger
	

8k
		Iowa
	

8k
		Supplemental Indenture
	

8k
		Note
	

8k
		Equity Incentive Plan
	

7k
		Kentucky
	

7k
		Stock Purchase Agreement
	

7k
		Alabama
	














×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.










KMP Futures Fund I LLC: CEO and Executives - Bloomberg







































  





















































































July 29, 2017 5:04 AM ET

Company Overview of KMP Futures Fund I LLC



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Key Executives for KMP Futures Fund I LLC
NameBoard RelationshipsTitleAgeThere is no Key Executives data available.
KMP Futures Fund I LLC Board Members*
NameBoard RelationshipsPrimary CompanyAgeThere is no Board Members data available.
KMP Futures Fund I LLC Executive Committees*
Committee NameChairpersonBoard RelationshipsMembersThere is no committee data available.
*Data is at least as current as the most recent Definitive Proxy.
Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



CEO COMPENSATION IN THIS INDUSTRY  Industry Range










INDUSTRY EXECUTIVE CHANGESThere is no Executive Change data available.Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact KMP Futures Fund I LLC, please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























KMP Futures Fund I LLC: Private Company Information - Bloomberg








































  





















































































July 29, 2017 5:04 AM ET

Company Overview of KMP Futures Fund I LLC



Snapshot People




Company Overview



900 King StreetSuite 100Rye Brook, NY 10573United States



Phone: 914-307-7000








Key Executives for KMP Futures Fund I LLC


KMP Futures Fund I LLC does not have any Key Executives recorded. 



KMP Futures Fund I LLC Key Developments

KMP Futures Fund I LLC Announces Auditor Changes
Apr 11 16
On March 25, 2016, Kenmar Preferred Investments LLC, the Managing Member of KMP Futures Fund I LLC, dismissed EisnerAmper LLP as the registered public accounting firm for the company. On April 11, 2016, the Managing Member, on behalf of the company, approved the engagement of Arthur F. Bell, Jr. & Associates, L.L.C. as the registered public accounting firm for the company.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 	Aryzta Us Holdings I Corp. United States 	Michael Anthony Hernandez, A Professional Corp United States !SOLUTIONS! Group United States "Atlantic Tele-Satellite, Inc. United States "D" Construction, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact KMP Futures Fund I LLC, please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























	EDGAR Online Pro 































                                     
                                




Welcome


                                                |
                                            

Help


                                                |
                                            

About EDGAR Online
                                                   


                                                |
                                            

 Login 















Dashboard 

Today 
Company

Industry

Search
Screener

Analytics
















































Enter your Email to Learn More:  
                                 












Form






                         (Filer)
                    

                         Received

                        (
                        Period
                        
                        ) 
                    


10-K

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 03/31/17 (12/31/16) 


15-12G

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 02/02/17 


8-K

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 02/01/17 (02/01/17) 


10-Q

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 11/14/16 (09/30/16) 


10-Q

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 08/12/16 (06/30/16) 


10-Q

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 05/17/16 (03/31/16) 


8-K

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 04/13/16 (04/13/16) 


8-K

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 04/11/16 (04/11/16) 


10-K

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 03/23/16 (12/31/15) 


8-K

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 01/06/16 (01/05/16) 


8-K

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 01/06/16 (01/05/16) 


10-Q

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 11/12/15 (09/30/15) 


10-Q

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 08/13/15 (06/30/15) 


10-Q

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 05/14/15 (03/31/15) 


8-K

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 05/05/15 (05/05/15) 


10-K

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 03/17/15 (12/31/14) 


10-Q

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 11/12/14 (09/30/14) 


10-Q

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 08/13/14 (06/30/14) 


10-Q

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 05/12/14 (03/31/14) 


8-K

KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC
 04/28/14 (04/28/14) 




                             
                        












             Results 1 - 20 of 56




 


  
            
                    [1]
2
3
                
             
             


[ Show Next 20 Results ] 





























                 
            











            © 1995-2017

EDGAR® Online, a division of Donnelley Financial Solutions
            All rights reserved  Solutions
                for Corporations 
            Terms of Use
             
                Privacy Statement












KMP Futures Fund I LLC














































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog











KMP Futures Fund I LLC Executives

 officer: SEVP & COO of MM 
Esther E Goodman Esther E Goodman
 director 
Ken Shewer
 director 
Marc Goodman
 officer: SVP & Dir of Fund Admin of MM 
David K Spohr






Related Companies

AAA Energy Opportunities Fund LLC
APM - Eckhardt Futures Fund, L.P.
APMEX Physical - 1 oz. Gold Redeemable Trust
Aaa Capital Energy Fund L.P. II
Ais Futures Fund Iv Lp
AlphaMetrix Managed Futures III LLC (AlphaMetrix WC Diversified Series)
AlphaMetrix Managed Futures LLC
Altegris QIM Futures Fund, L.P.
Altegris Winton Futures Fund, L.P.
Altin:Fund, Limited Partnership
Aspect FuturesAccess LLC
Aspen Diversified Fund LLC
Aspirity Holdings Llc
Atlas Futures Fund Limited Partnership
Beacon Financial Futures Fund Lp



        More Related Companies
      





Home



Sample Contracts



By Company


KMP Futures Fund I LLC




KMP Futures Fund I LLC





      Loading...
    





Standard IndustryClassification
Commodity contracts brokers & dealersAddress

900 King Street, Rye Brook, NY 10573
Phone
914-307-7000





Executives

 officer: SEVP & COO of MM 
Esther E Goodman Esther E Goodman
 director 
Ken Shewer
 director 
Marc Goodman
 officer: SVP & Dir of Fund Admin of MM 
David K Spohr



Sample Contracts



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Administrative Services Agreement
(August 15th, 2011)




KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Middle/Back Office Services Agreement
(August 15th, 2011)




KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Kmp Futures Fund I Llc Amendment No. 1 to Advisory Agreement
(November 12th, 2010)
This AMENDMENT NO. 1 (the Amendment), dated as of the 1st day of July, 2010 to the Advisory Agreement (the Original Agreement), by and among dated as of the 20th day of November, 2006, by and among KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Company), KENMAR PREFERRED INVESTMENT SOLUTIONS CORP., a Delaware corporation (the Administrator), and WINTON CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LIMITED, a company registered in England and Wales (the Advisor).



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Kmp Futures Fund I Llc Amendment No. 1 to Advisory Agreement
(November 12th, 2010)
This AMENDMENT NO. 1 (the Amendment), dated as of the 1st day of July, 2010, by and among KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (KMPFF), KENMAR PREFERRED INVESTMENTS CORP., a Delaware corporation (the Managing Member) and GRAHAM CAPITAL MANAGEMENT, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the Advisor).



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Kmp Futures Fund I Llc Advisory Agreement
(June 3rd, 2010)
ADVISORY AGREEMENT (this Agreement) dated as of the 1st day of July, 2010, by and among KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (KMPFF), KENMAR PREFERRED INVESTMENTS CORP., a Delaware corporation (the Managing Member) and GRAHAM CAPITAL MANAGEMENT, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the Advisor).



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Master Confirmation for Exotic Options
(November 2nd, 2009)
The purpose of this Master Agreement Supplement (the Supplement) is to set forth certain terms, conditions, and definitions that will apply to any exotic option transaction (a Transaction) listed on Exhibit A hereto. As may be entered into from time to time between UBS AG (Party A) and WCM Pool LLC (Party B) provided, however, that nothing herein shall be deemed to obligate the parties to enter into Transactions with each other on these or any other terms. The parties shall confirm Transactions between each other using market-standard methodologies (which may include confirmations through electronic messaging systems, such as the relevant MT 305 SWIFT Message Type) (each such confirmation referred to herein as a Transaction Details Confirmation). Each Transaction Details Confirmation, regardless of its form or its manner of delivery, shall be subject to, and shall be deemed to include, the terms of this Supplement; in the event of any inconsistency between this Supplement and any such 



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc. MASTER AGREEMENT Dated as
of February 7, 2008 Between
(November 2nd, 2009)
have entered and/or anticipate entering into one or more transactions (each a Transaction) that are or will be governed by this Master Agreement, which includes the schedule (the Schedule), and the documents and other confirming evidence (each a Confirmation) exchanged between the parties confirming those Transactions.



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
MASTER CONFIRMATION AGREEMENT FOR NON-DELIVERABLE FORWARD FX TRANSACTIONS Dated
as of February L L, 2008 (The Effective Date) Between UBS AG (Party A) and WCM
Pool LLC (Party B)
(November 2nd, 2009)
The parties wish to facilitate the process of entering into and confirming non-deliverable forward foreign exchange transactions and accordingly agree as follows:



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Advisory Agreement
(November 2nd, 2009)
ADVISORY AGREEMENT (the Agreement) dated as of the 20th day of November, 2006, by and among WCM POOL LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Company), PREFERRED INVESTMENT SOLUTIONS CORP., a Delaware corporation (the Administrator), and WINTON CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LIMITED, a company registered in England and Wales (the Advisor).



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Fx Prime Brokerage Agreement
(November 2nd, 2009)
This FX PRIME BROKERAGE AGREEMENT (Agreement), dated as of February 7, 2008, by and between UBS AG (UBS) and WCM Pool LLC (Customer), a Delaware limited liability company (Company), and sets forth certain terms and conditions relating to the establishment of a facility (the Facility) through which the Customer, acting by and through a Trading Advisor, except as otherwise indicated, who is acting as the agent for said Customer (and not in the Trading Advisors individual capacity) may trade foreign exchange transactions with various Dealers.



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Services Agreement
(November 2nd, 2009)
This Services Agreement (this Agreement), dated as of May 23, 2007 (Effective Date), is entered into by and between SPECTRUM GLOBAL FUND ADMINISTRATION, L.L.C., a Delaware limited liability company (the Company), and WCM POOL LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Client), under the following circumstances:



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Amendment No. 1 to the Ubs Securities Llc Futures and Options Customer
Agreement
(November 2nd, 2009)
This Amendment No. 1 (Amendment) to the UBS Securities LLC Futures and Options Customer Agreement (Agreement) dated as December 4, 2006 by and between UBS Securities LLC (UBS-S LCC) and WCM Pool LLC (Customer) is made as of this 9th day of October, 2009 by and between UBS-S LLC and Customer.



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Customer Agreement
(November 2nd, 2009)
This Customer Agreement (Agreement) between UBS Securities LLC (UBS-S LLC) and WCM Pool LLC (Customer) shall govern the purchase and sale by UBS-S LLC of certain futures contracts, options thereon and options contracts for the account and risk of Customer through one or more accounts carried by UBS-S LLC on behalf and in the name of Customer (collectively, the Account), as more fully described below. Business Day as used in this Agreement means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday and/or other day on which the New York Stock Exchange is closed.



KMP Futures Fund I LLC –
Amendment
(November 2nd, 2009)
This Amendment (the Amendment) is made and entered into on this 13th day of October, 2009 between UBS AG, a banking corporation organized under the laws of Switzerland (Party A) and WCM Pool LLC, a limited liability company organized under the laws of the State of Delaware (Party B).













×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.











Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















Kmp Futures Fund I Llc Advisory Agreement - Llc Operating Agreement - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > LLC Operating Agreement     > KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC ADVISORY AGREEMENT

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Kmp Futures Fund I Llc Advisory Agreement
LLC Operating Agreement



You are currently viewing:
 This LLC Operating Agreement involves GRAHAM CAPITAL MANAGEMENT, LP | KENMAR PREFERRED INVESTMENTS CORP . RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC ADVISORY AGREEMENT Governing Law: New York      Date: 6/3/2010 Law Firm: Alston Bird      









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day









Exhibit 10.10
 

KMP FUTURES FUND I
LLC

ADVISORY AGREEMENT

ADVISORY AGREEMENT
(this “ Agreement
”) dated as of the 1 st day of July, 2010, by and among KMP FUTURES
FUND I LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (“
KMPFF ”), KENMAR PREFERRED INVESTMENTS CORP. ,
a Delaware corporation (the “ Managing Member ”)
and GRAHAM CAPITAL MANAGEMENT, L.P., a Delaware limited
partnership (the “ Advisor ”).

W
I T N
E S S E T H
:

WHEREAS , KMPFF has been organized primarily for the
purpose of trading, buying, selling, spreading or otherwise
acquiring, holding or disposing of futures, forward and options
contracts with respect to commodities. Other transactions also may
be effected from time to time, including among others, those as
more fully identified in Exhibit A hereto; the foregoing
commodities and other transactions are collectively referred to as
“ Commodities ”; and

WHEREAS , the Managing Member is the managing member of
KMPFF; and

WHEREAS , the Managing Member is authorized to utilize
the services of one or more professional commodity trading advisors
in connection with the Commodities trading activities of KMPFF;
and

WHEREAS , the Advisor’s present business includes
the management of Commodities accounts for its clients;
and

WHEREAS , the Advisor is registered as a commodity
trading advisor under the United States Commodity Exchange Act, as
amended (the “ CE Act ”), and is a member of the
National Futures Association (the “ NFA ”) as a
commodity trading advisor and will maintain such registration and
membership for the term of this Agreement; and

WHEREAS , KMPFF, the Managing Member and the Advisor
desire to enter into this Agreement in order to set forth the terms
and conditions upon which the Advisor will render and implement
commodity trading advisory services on behalf of KMPFF during the
term of this Agreement.

NOW, THEREFORE
, the parties agree as
follows:

1. Duties of the Advisor
.

(a) Appointment . KMPFF
hereby appoints the Advisor, and the Advisor hereby accepts such
appointment, as KMPFF’s limited attorney-in-fact to exercise
discretion to invest and reinvest in Commodities during the term of
this Agreement of the assets of KMPFF allocated to the Advisor (the
“ Allocated Assets ”) on the terms and
conditions and for the purposes set forth herein. This limited
power-of-attorney is a continuing power and shall continue in
effect with respect to the Advisor until terminated hereunder. The
Advisor shall have sole authority and responsibility for
independently directing the investment and reinvestment in
Commodities of the Allocated Assets for the term of this Agreement
pursuant to the trading programs, methods, systems, and strategies
described in Exhibit A hereto, which KMPFF and the Managing Member
have selected to be utilized by the Advisor in trading the
Allocated Assets (collectively referred to as the Advisor’s
“ Trading Approach ”), subject to the trading
policies and limitations as set forth in KMPFF’s Confidential
Information dated May 14, 2010, as
 
1


Exhibit 10.10
 
amended or supplemented from time to time (the
“ Memorandum ”) and attached hereto as Exhibit B
(the “ Trading Policies and Limitations ”), as
the same may be modified from time to time and provided in writing
to the Advisor. The portion of the Allocated Assets to be allocated
by the Advisor at any point in time to one or more of the various
trading strategies comprising the Advisor’s Trading Approach
will be determined as set forth in Exhibit A hereto, as it may be
amended from time to time, with the consent of the parties, it
being understood that trading gains and losses automatically will
alter the agreed upon allocations. Upon receipt of a new
allocation, the Advisor will determine and, if required, adjust its
trading in light of the new allocation.

(b) Allocation of
Responsibilities . KMPFF will have the responsibility for the
management of any portion of the Allocated Assets that are not
invested in Commodities. The Advisor will use its good faith and
best efforts in determining the investment and reinvestment in
Commodities of the Allocated Assets in compliance with the Trading
Policies and Limitations, and in accordance with the
Advisor’s Trading Approach. In the event that KMPFF shall, in
its sole discretion, determine in good faith following consultation
appropriate under the circumstances with the Advisor that any
trading instruction issued by the Advisor violates the Trading
Policies and Limitations, then KMPFF, following reasonable notice
to the Advisor appropriate under the circumstances, may override
such trading instruction and shall be responsible therefore.
Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent the Managing Member
from imposing any limitation(s) on the trading activities of KMPFF
beyond those enumerated in the Memorandum if the Managing Member
determines that such limitation(s) are necessary or in the best
interests of KMPFF, in which case the Advisor will adhere to such
limitations following written notification thereof.

(c) Gains From Trading
Approach . The Advisor agrees that at least 90% of the annual
gross income and gain, if any, generated by its Trading Approach
for Allocated Assets will be “qualifying income” within
the meaning of Section 7704(d) of the Code (it being
understood that such income will largely result from buying and
selling Commodities and that the Trading Approach is not intended
primarily to generate interest income). The Advisor also agrees
that it will attempt to trade in such a manner as to allow non-U.S.
investors in KMPFF (all investors in KMPFF, the “
Members ”) to qualify for the safe harbors found in
Section 864(b)(2) of the Code and as interpreted in the
regulations promulgated or proposed thereunder.

(d) Modification of Trading
Approach . In the event the Advisor requests to use, or KMPFF
requests the Advisor to use, a trading program, system, method or
strategy other than or in addition to the trading programs,
systems, methods or strategies comprising the Trading Approach in
connection with trading for KMPFF (including, without limitation,
the deletion or addition of an agreed upon trading program, system,
method or strategy to the then agreed upon Trading Approach or a
modification in the leverage employed), either in whole or in part,
the Advisor may not do so and/or shall not be required to do so, as
appropriate, unless both KMPFF and the Advisor consent thereto in
writing.

(e) Notification of Material
Changes . The Advisor also agrees to give KMPFF prior written
notice of any proposed material change in its Trading Approach, and
agrees not to make any material change in such Trading Approach (as
applied to KMPFF) over the objection of KMPFF, it being understood
that the Advisor shall be free to institute non-material changes in
its Trading Approach (as applied to KMPFF) without prior written
notification. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing,
refinements to the Advisor’s Trading Approach, and the
deletion (but not the addition) of Commodities (other than the
addition of Commodities then being traded (i) on organized
domestic commodities exchanges, (ii) on foreign commodities
exchanges recognized by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission
(the “ CFTC ”) as providing customer protections
comparable to those provided on domestic exchanges, or
(iii) in the interbank foreign currency market) to or from the
Advisor’s Trading Approach shall not be deemed a material
change in the Advisor’s Trading Approach, and prior approval
of KMPFF
 
2


Exhibit 10.10
 
shall not be required therefore. The utilization
of forward markets in addition to those enumerated in Exhibit C
hereto would be deemed a material change to the Advisor’s
Trading Approach and prior approval shall be required
therefor.

Subject to adequate assurances of
confidentiality, the Advisor agrees that it will discuss with KMPFF
upon request any trading methods, programs, systems or strategies
used by it for trading customer accounts which differ from the
Trading Approach used for KMPFF, provided that nothing
contained in this Agreement shall require the Advisor to disclose
what it deems to be proprietary or confidential information in its
reasonable discretion.

(f) Request for Information .
The Advisor agrees to provide KMPFF with any reasonable information
concerning the Advisor that KMPFF may reasonably request (other
than the identity of its customers or proprietary or confidential
information concerning the Trading Approach), subject to receipt of
adequate assurances of confidentiality by KMPFF, including, but not
limited to, information regarding any change in control, key
personnel, Trading Approach and financial condition which KMPFF
reasonably deems to be material to KMPFF; the Advisor also shall
notify KMPFF of any such matters the Advisor, in its reasonable
judgment, believes may be material to KMPFF relating to the Advisor
and its Trading Approach. During the term of this Agreement, the
Advisor agrees to provide KMPFF with updated monthly information
related to the Advisor’s performance results within a
reasonable period of time after the end of the month to which it
relates.

(g) Notice of Errors . The
Advisor is responsible for promptly reviewing all oral and written
confirmations it receives to determine that the Commodities trades
were made in accordance with the Advisor’s instructions. If
the Advisor determines that an error was made in connection with a
trade or that a trade was made other than in accordance with the
Advisor’s instructions, the Advisor shall promptly notify
KMPFF of this fact and shall utilize its reasonable efforts to
cause the error or discrepancy to be corrected.

(h) Liability . Neither the
Advisor nor any employee, partner or officer of the Advisor, nor
any person who controls the Advisor, shall be liable to KMPFF, its
Managing Member, officers, directors, shareholders, members, or
employees, or any person who controls KMPFF, or any of their
respective successors or assignees under this Agreement, except by
reason of acts or omissions in material breach of this Agreement or
due to their willful misconduct or gross negligence or by reason of
their not having acted in good faith in the reasonable belief that
such actions or omissions were in, or not opposed to, the best
interests of KMPFF and its Members; it being understood that the
Advisor makes no guarantee of profit nor guarantee against loss,
and that all purchases and sales of Commodities shall be for the
account and risk of KMPFF, and the Advisor shall incur no liability
for trading profits or losses resulting therefrom provided the
Advisor would not otherwise be liable to KMPFF under the terms
hereof.

(i) Initial Allocation,
Additional Allocations, and Reallocations . Initially, the
Allocated Assets will total an amount allocated to the Advisor by
the Managing Member.

(j) Additional Allocations and
Reallocations . Subject to Section 10(a) below, KMPFF may,
on a monthly basis, as described in the Memorandum,
(i) allocate additional assets to the Advisor,
(ii) reallocate the Allocated Assets away from the Advisor to
another commodity trading advisor (an “ Other Advisor
”), (iii) reallocate assets to the Advisor from an Other
Advisor or (iv) allocate additional capital with respect to
KMPFF to an Other Advisor.

(k) Delivery of Disclosure
Document . The Advisor agrees to provide to the Managing Member
with any amendment or supplement to the Disclosure Document
attached hereto as Exhibit C (an “ Update ”) as
soon as such Update is available for distribution following the
filing of such update in final form with the NFA.
 
3


Exhibit 10.10
 

2. Indemnification
.

(a) The Advisor . Subject to
the provisions of Section 3 of this Agreement, the Advisor,
each partner, officer and employee of the Advisor, and each person
who controls the Advisor, shall be indemnified, defended, and held
harmless by KMPFF from and against any and all claims, losses,
judgments, liabilities, damages, costs, expenses (including,
without limitation, reasonable investigatory and attorneys’
fees and expenses) and amounts paid in settlement of any claims in
compliance with the conditions specified below (collectively,
“ Losses ”) sustained by any of them (i) in
connection with any acts or omissions of KMPFF or the Managing
Member ,or any of its partners, officers or employees constituting
negligence or willful misconduct in connection with this Agreement,
(ii) as a result of a material breach of this Agreement by
KMPFF or the Managing Member, provided that, (1) such
Losses were not the result of negligence, misconduct or a material
breach of this Agreement on the part of the Advisor, any of its
partners, officers or employees or any person controlling the
Advisor, (2) the Advisor, and its partners, officers,
employees, and each person controlling the Advisor, acted or
omitted to act in good faith and in a manner reasonably believed by
such person to be in or not opposed to the best interests of KMPFF
, and provided further , that no indemnification
shall be permitted under this Section 2 for amounts paid in
settlement if either (A) the Advisor fails to notify KMPFF of
the terms of any settlement proposed, at least fifteen
(15) days before any amounts are paid, or (B) KMPFF does
not approve the amount of the settlement within fifteen
(15) days (such approval not to be withheld unreasonably).
Notwithstanding the foregoing, KMPFF shall, at all times, have the
right to offer to settle any matter with the approval of the
Advisor (which approval shall not be withheld unreasonably) and if
KMPFF successfully negotiates a settlement and tenders payment
therefore to the party claiming indemnification (the “
Indemnitee ”) the Indemnitee must either use its
reasonable efforts to dispose of the matter in accordance with the
terms and conditions of the proposed settlement or the Indemnitee
may refuse to settle the matter and continue its defense in which
latter event the maximum liability of KMPFF to the Indemnitee shall
be the amount of said proposed settlement. Any indemnification by
KMPFF under this Section 2, unless ordered by a court, shall
be made only as authorized in the specific case by
KMPFF.

(b) The Managing Member and
KMPFF . KMPFF and the Managing Member, and each partner,
officer and employee of the Managing Member, and each person who
controls the Managing Member, shall be indemnified, defended, and
held harmless by the Advisor, from and against any and all Losses
sustained by KMPFF or the Managing Member (i) in connection
with any acts or omissions of the Advisor, or any of its partners,
officers or employees relating to its management of the Allocated
Assets constituting negligence or willful misconduct, including in
connection with this Agreement or otherwise as a result of the
Advisor’s performance of services on behalf of KMPFF or its
role as trading advisor to the Allocated Assets, (ii) as a
result of a material breach of this Agreement by the Advisor, or
(iii) a breach of the disclosure requirements of the CE Act
that relate to the Advisor’s past performance history,
provided that, (1) such Losses were not the result of
negligence, misconduct or a material breach of this Agreement on
the part of KMPFF, the Managing Member or any of its partners,
officers or employees or any person controlling the Managing
Member, and (ii) KMPFF, the Managing Member and its partners,
officers, employees, and each person controlling the Managing
Member, acted or omitted to act in good faith and in a manner
reasonably believed by such person to be in or not opposed to the
best interests of the Advisor, and provided further ,
that no indemnification shall be permitted under this
Section 2 for amounts paid in settlement if either
(A) the Managing Member fails to notify the Advisor of the
terms of any settlement proposed, at least fifteen (15) days
before any amounts are paid, or (B) the Advisor does not
approve the amount of the settlement within fifteen (15) days
(such approval not to be withheld unreasonably). Notwithstanding
the foregoing, the Advisor shall, at all times, have the right to
offer to settle any matter with the approval of the Managing Member
(which approval shall not be
 
4


Exhibit 10.10
 
withheld unreasonably) and if the Advisor
successfully negotiates a settlement and tenders payment therefore
to the Indemnitee, the Indemnitee must either use its reasonable
efforts to dispose of the matter in accordance with the terms and
conditions of the proposed settlement or the Indemnitee may refuse
to settle the matter and continue its defense in which latter event
the maximum liability of the Advisor to the Indemnitee shall be the
amount of said proposed settlement.

(c) Default Judgments and
Confessions of Judgment . None of the foregoing provisions for
indemnification shall be applicable with respect to default
judgments or confessions of judgment entered into by the
Indemnitee, with its knowledge, without the prior consent of
KMPFF.

(d) Procedure . In the event
that an Indemnitee under this Section 2 is made a party to an
action, suit or proceeding alleging both matters for which
indemnification can be made hereunder and matters for which
indemnification may not be made hereunder, such Indemnitee shall be
indemnified only for that portion of the Losses incurred in such
action, suit or proceeding which relates to the matters for which
indemnification can be made.

(e) Expenses . Expenses
incurred in defending a threatened or pending civil, administrative
or criminal action, suit or proceeding against an Indemnitee shall
be paid by KMPFF in advance of the final disposition of such
action, suit or proceeding if (i) the legal action, suit or
proceeding, if sustained, would entitle the Indemnitee to
indemnification pursuant to the terms of this Section 2, and
(ii) the Advisor undertakes to repay the advanced funds to
KMPFF in cases in which the Indemnitee is not entitled to
indemnification pursuant to this Section 2, and (iii) in
the case of advancement of expenses , the Indemnitee is not likely
not to be entitled to indemnification hereunder.

3. Limits on Claims
.

(a) Prohibited Acts . The
Advisor agrees that it will not take any of the following actions
against KMPFF: (i) seek a decree or order by a court having
jurisdiction in the premises (A) for relief in respect of
KMPFF in an involuntary case or proceeding under the Federal
Bankruptcy Code or any other federal or state bankruptcy,
insolvency, reorganization, rehabilitation, liquidation or similar
law or (B) adjudging KMPFF a bankrupt or insolvent, or seeking
reorganization, rehabilitation, liquidation, arrangement,
adjustment or composition of or in respect of KMPFF under the
Federal Bankruptcy Code or any other applicable federal or state
law, or appointing a custodian, receiver, liquidator, assignee,
trustee, sequestrator (or other similar official) of KMPFF or of
any substantial part of any of its properties, or ordering the
winding up or liquidation of any of its affairs, (ii) seek a
petition for relief, reorganization or to take advantage of any law
referred to in the preceding clause or (iii) file an
involuntary petition for bankruptcy (collectively, “
Bankruptcy or Insolvency Action ”).

(b) No Member Liability .
This Agreement has been made and executed by and on behalf of KMPFF
for the benefit of KMPFF and the obligations of KMPFF set forth
herein are not binding upon any of the Members individually, but
are binding only upon the assets and property identified above and
no resort shall be had to the Member’s personal property for
the satisfaction of any obligation or claim hereunder.

4. Obligations of KMPFF, the
Managing Member and the Advisor .

(a) The Memorandum . Each of
KMPFF and the Managing Member agrees to cooperate and use its good
faith and reasonable efforts in connection with (i) the
preparation by KMPFF of the Memorandum (and any amendments or
supplements thereto), (ii) the filing of all documents (and
any amendments or supplements thereto) with such governmental and
self-regulatory authorities as the Managing Member deems
appropriate for the sale of limited liability company interests in
KMPFF (the
 
5


Exhibit 10.10
 
“ Interests ”) and the taking
of such other actions not inconsistent with this Agreement as the
Managing Member may determine to be necessary or advisable in order
to make the proposed offer and sale of Interests lawful in any
jurisdiction, and (iii) the taking of such other actions as
the Managing Member may reasonably determine to be necessary or
advisable in order to comply with any other legal or regulatory
requirements applicable to KMPFF. The Advisor agrees to make all
required disclosures regarding itself, its officers and principals,
trading performance, Trading Approach, customer accounts (other
than the names of customers, unless such disclosure is required by
law or regulation) and otherwise as may be required, in the
reasonable judgment of counsel to the Managing Member, to be made
in the Memorandum and in applications to any such jurisdictions by
reason of any law or regulation applicable to KMPFF. Except as
required by applicable law or regulations, no description of, or
other information relating to, the Advisor may be distributed by
the Managing Member without the prior written consent of the
Advisor, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or
delayed; provided that distribution of performance information
relating to KMPFF’s account shall not require consent of the
Advisor.

(b) Advisor Not A Promoter .
The parties acknowledge that the Advisor has not been, either alone
or in conjunction with the Managing Member or its affiliates, an
organizer or promoter of KMPFF, and it is not intended by the
parties that the Advisor shall have any liability as
such.

5. Advisor Independence
.

(a) Independent Contractor .
The Advisor shall for all purposes herein be deemed to be an
independent contractor with respect to KMPFF, the Managing Member
and its affiliates and each other commodity trading advisor that
may in the future provide commodity trading advisory services to
KMPFF and the Managing Member and its affiliates, and shall, unless
otherwise expressly authorized, have no authority to act for or to
represent KMPFF, the Managing Member and its affiliates, any other
commodity trading advisor or the Selling Agent in any way or
otherwise be deemed to be a general agent, joint venturer or
partner of KMPFF, the Managing Member and its affiliates or any
other commodity trading advisor, or in any way be responsible for
the acts or omissions of KMPFF, the Managing Member and its
affiliates or any other commodity trading advisor as long as it is
acting independently of such persons.

(b) Purchase of Interests .
Any of the Advisor, its principals and employees may, in its
discretion, purchase Interests in KMPFF.

(c) Confidentiality . KMPFF
and the Managing Member acknowledge that the Trading Approach of
the Advisor is the confidential property of the Advisor. Nothing in
this Agreement shall require the Advisor to disclose the
confidential or proprietary details of its Trading Approach. KMPFF
and the Managing Member further agree that they will keep
confidential and will not disseminate the Advisor’s trading
advice to KMPFF, except as, and to the extent that, it may be
determined by KMPFF to be (i) necessary for the monitoring or
conduct of the business of KMPFF, including the performance of
brokerage services by KMPFF’s commodity broker(s), or
(ii) expressly required by law or regulation.

6. Commodity Broker
.

All Commodities traded for the
account of KMPFF shall be made through such commodity broker or
brokers or counterparty or counterparties as KMPFF directs or
otherwise in accordance with such order execution procedures as are
agreed upon between the Advisor and KMPFF. Except as set forth
below, the Advisor shall not have any authority or responsibility
in selecting or supervising any floor broker or counterparty for
execution of Commodities trades of KMPFF or for negotiating floor
brokerage commission rates or other compensation to be charged
therefore. The Advisor
 
6


Exhibit 10.10
 
shall not be responsible for determining that
any such broker or counterparty used in connection with any
Commodities transactions meets the financial requirements or
standards imposed by KMPFF’s Trading Policies and
Limitations. At the present time it is contemplated that KMPFF will
clear all Commodities trades through UBS Securities LLC or its
affiliates, and it is contemplated that KMPFF will execute (but not
clear) all foreign currency forwards through its facility with Bank
of America, N.A. (and the Advisor will have Bank of America, N.A.
enter into appropriate “give-in” arrangements with UBS
Securities LLC or its affiliates). The Advisor may, however, with
the consent of KMPFF, such consent not to be unreasonably withheld,
execute transactions at such other firm(s), and upon such terms and
conditions, as the Advisor and KMPFF agree if such firm(s) agree to
“give up” all such transactions to UBS Securities LLC
for clearance. To the extent that KMPFF determines to utilize a
broker or counterparty other than UBS Securities LLC or its
affiliates, KMPFF will consult with the Advisor prior to directing
it to utilize such broker or counterparty, and will not retain the
services of such firm(s) over the reasonable objection of the
Advisor.

7. Fees .

In consideration of and in
compensation for the performance of the Advisor’s services
under this Agreement, the Advisor shall receive from KMPFF a
monthly management fee (the “ Management Fee ”)
and a quarterly incentive fee (the “ Incentive Fee
”) based on the Allocated Assets, which in all events shall
be unaffected by the performance of any other trading advisor, as
follows:

(a) A Management Fee equal to
1/12 th
of 2% (2% per annum) of the
Allocated Assets determined as of the close of business on the last
day of each month. In the event that the Managing Member and the
Advisor agree that the Trading Approach should be modified to alter
the agreed upon trading level of 1.5:1, an appropriate adjustment
in the monthly Management Fee will be made to reflect the revised
leverage. For purposes of determining the Management Fee, any
distributions, redemptions, or reallocation of the Allocated Assets
made as of the last day of a month shall be added back to the
Allocated Assets and there shall be no reduction for (i) the
monthly Management Fees being calculated, (ii) any accrued but
unpaid Incentive Fees due to the Advisor under paragraph
(b) below for the quarter in which such fees are being
computed, or (iii) any accrued but unpaid extraordinary
expenses (as defined in KMPFF’s Amended and Restated Limited
Liability Company Agreement, as the same may be amended from time
to time (the “ LLC Operating Agreement ”)). The
Management Fee determined for any month in which an Advisor manages
the Allocated Assets for less than a full month shall be pro rated,
such proration to be calculated on the basis of the number of days
in the month the Allocated Assets were under the Advisor’s
management as compared to the total number of days in such month,
with such proration to include appropriate adjustments for any
funds taken away from the Advisor’s management during the
month for reasons other than distributions or
redemptions.

(b) An Incentive Fee of 22% (the
“ Incentive Fee ”) of “ New High Net
Trading Profits ” (as hereinafter defined) generated on
the Allocated Assets, including realized and unrealized gains and
losses thereon, as of the close of business on the last day of each
calendar quarter (the “ Incentive Measurement Date
”). For purposes of computing the Net Asset Value of the
Allocated Assets only, the Incentive Fee will be accrued
monthly.

New High Net Trading Profits (for
purposes of calculating the Advisor’s Incentive Fee only)
will be computed as of the Incentive Measurement Date and will
include such profits (as outlined below) since the immediately
preceding Incentive Measurement Date (each an “ Incentive
Measurement Period ”).

New High Net Trading Profits for any
Incentive Measurement Period will be the net profits, if any, from
trading the Allocated Assets during such period (including
(i) realized trading profit
 
7


Exhibit 10.10
 
(loss) plus or minus (ii) the change in
unrealized trading profit (loss) on open positions) and will be
calculated after the determination of (reduction for) the fees
charged to KMPFF for brokerage commissions attributable to the
Allocated Assets, KMPFF’s transaction fees and costs
attributable to the Allocated Assets (including without limitation
exchange fees and NFA fees), the Advisor’s Management Fee,
the operating expenses for which the Allocated Assets are
responsible, and any extraordinary expenses (e.g., litigation,
costs or damages) paid during an Incentive Measurement Period which
are specifically related to the Advisor, but before deduction of
any Incentive Fees payable during the Incentive Measurement Period.
New High Net Trading Profits will not include interest earned or
credited on the Allocated Assets. New High Net Trading Profits will
be generated only to the extent that the Advisor’s cumulative
New High Net Trading Profits exceed the highest level of cumulative
New High Net Trading Profits achieved by the Advisor as of a
previous Incentive Measurement Date. Except as set forth below, net
losses from prior quarters (including any cumulative net losses as
of the close of business on June 30, 2010 with respect to
World Monitor Trust II – Series E (“ Series E
”) which the Advisor was required to recoup under the Trading
Advisor Agreement dated September 17, 1999 as amended
March 1, 2009 among Series E, Preferred Investment Solutions
Corp. and the Advisor (the “ Series E Agreement
”) must be recouped before New High Net Trading Profits can
again be generated. If a withdrawal or distribution occurs or if
this Agreement is terminated at any date that is not an Incentive
Measurement Date, the date of the withdrawal or distribution or
termination will be treated as if it were an Incentive Measurement
Date, but any Incentive Fee accrued in respect of the withdrawn
assets on such date shall not be paid to the Advisor until the next
scheduled Incentive Measurement Date. New High Net Trading Profits
for an Incentive Measurement Period shall exclude capital
contributions to the Allocated Assets in an Incentive Measurement
Period, distributions or redemptions paid or payable from the
Allocated Assets during an Incentive Measurement Period, as well as
losses, if any, associated with redemptions, distributions, and
reallocations of assets during the Incentive Measurement Period and
prior to the Incentive Measurement Date (i.e., to the extent that
assets are allocated away from the Advisor (through redemptions,
distributions or allocations caused by KMPFF), any loss
carryforward attributable to the Advisor shall be reduced in the
same proportion that the value of the assets allocated away from
the Advisor comprises the value of the Allocated Assets prior to
such allocation away from the Advisor. In calculating New High Net
Trading Profits, incentive fees paid for a previous Incentive
Measurement Period will not reduce cumulative New High Net Trading
Profits in subsequent periods.

Any net gains that have accumulated
since the most recent Incentive Measurement Date under the Series E
Agreement shall be carried forward to the next Incentive
Measurement Date commencing with this Agreement.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the
Advisor acknowledges and agrees that

(c) Timing of Payment .
Management Fees and Incentive Fees shall be paid generally within
fifteen (15) business days following the end of the period for
which they are payable. Given that the Trading Advisor has been
trading Series E assets under the Series E Agreement prior to the
execution of this Agreement, the first incentive fee which may be
due and owing to the Advisor in respect of any New High Net Trading
Profits will be due and owing as of the end of the first calendar
quarter during which the Trading Advisor began managing the
Allocated Assets under this Agreement. If an Incentive Fee shall
have been paid by KMPFF to the Advisor in respect of any calendar
quarter and the Advisor shall incur subsequent losses on the
Allocated Assets the Advisor shall nevertheless be entitled to
retain amounts previously paid to it in respect of New High Net
Trading Profits.

(d) Fee Data . KMPFF will
provide the Advisor with the data used by KMPFF to compute the
foregoing fees generally within fifteen (15) business days of
the end of the relevant period. The Advisor shall be free to
contest the calculations if in its reasonable judgment they are
inaccurate.
 
8


Exhibit 10.10
 

(e) Third Party Payments .
Neither the Advisor, nor any of its officers, directors, employees
or stockholders, shall receive any commissions, compensation,
remuneration or payments whatsoever from any broker with which
KMPFF carries an account for transactions executed in KMPFF’s
account. The parties acknowledge that a spouse of any of the
foregoing persons may receive floor brokerage commissions in
respect of trades effected pursuant to the Advisor’s Trading
Approach on behalf of KMPFF, which payment shall not violate the
preceding sentence.

8. Term and Termination
.

(a) Term . This Agreement
shall commence on the date hereof and, unless sooner terminated
pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c) or (d) of this
Section 8, shall continue in effect until the close of
business on the last day of the month ending twelve (12) full
months following the date hereof. Thereafter, unless this Agreement
is terminated pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c) or (d) of
this Section 8, this Agreement shall be renewed automatically
on the same terms and conditions set forth herein for successive
additional twelve-month terms, each of which shall commence on the
first day of the month subsequent to the conclusion of the
preceding term. Subject to Section 8(d)(iv) hereof, the
automatic renewal(s) set forth in the preceding sentence hereof
shall not be affected by (i) any allocation of the Allocated
Assets away from the Advisor pursuant to this Agreement, or
(ii) the retention of Other Advisors following a reallocation,
or otherwise.

(b) Automatic Termination .
This Agreement shall terminate automatically in the event that
KMPFF or KMPFF is terminated. In addition, this Agreement shall
terminate automatically in the event that the Allocated Assets
decline as of the end of any business day by at least 40% from the
Allocated Assets (i) as of the date hereof, or (ii) as of
the first day of any calendar year, as adjusted in each instance on
an ongoing basis by (A) any decline(s) in the Allocated Assets
caused by distributions, redemptions, reallocations, and
withdrawals, and (B) additions to the Allocated Assets caused
by additional allocations.

(c) Optional Termination Right of
KMPFF . This Agreement may be terminated at any time at the
election of KMPFF in its sole discretion upon at least thirty
(30) days’ prior written notice to the Advisor. This
Agreement also may be terminated at the election of KMPFF upon
prior written notice to the Advisor in the event that:
(i) KMPFF determines in good faith that the Advisor is unable
to use its agreed upon Trading Approach to any material extent, as
such Trading Approach may be refined or modified in the future in
accordance with the terms of this Agreement for the benefit of
KMPFF; (ii) the Advisor’s registration as a commodity
trading advisor under the CE Act or membership as a commodity
trading advisor with the NFA is revoked, suspended, terminated or
not renewed; (iii) KMPFF determines in good faith that the
Advisor has failed to conform, and after receipt of written notice,
continues to fail to conform in any material respect, to
(A) any of KMPFF’s Trading Policies and Limitations, or
(B) the Advisor’s Trading Approach; (iv) there is
an unauthorized assignment of this Agreement by the Advisor;
(v) the Advisor dissolves, merges or consolidates with another
entity, sells or transfers a substantial portion of its assets or
its business goodwill, or sells or transfers any portion of its
Trading Ap


 








 















KMP Futures Fund I LLC Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      KMP Futures Fund I LLC
                    

•   RYE BROOK, NY
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             KMP Futures Fund I is based out of Rye Brook.    The firm last filed a Form D notice of exempt offering of securities on 2009-10-27. The filing was for a pooled investment fund:  other investment fund The notice  included securities offered of Pooled Investment Fund Interests
                                           














Summary
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)
Form D 1



   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from KMP Futures Fund I LLC, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel














Contact Info




kmp futures fund i llc


900 KING STREET

RYE BROOK
NY
                                                        
                                                    10573


                                                      Business Phone:
                                                      914-307-7000
SEC SIC CODE:6221-COMMODITY CONTRACTS BROKERS & DEALERS







Recent SEC Filings




10-K filed on 03/31/2017
15-12G filed on 02/02/2017
8-K filed on 02/01/2017
10-Q filed on 11/14/2016
10-Q filed on 08/12/2016
10-Q filed on 05/17/2016
8-K filed on 04/13/2016
8-K filed on 04/11/2016
10-K filed on 03/23/2016
8-K filed on 01/06/2016
















Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...



Form D Filings

  Form D is a form to be used to file a notice of an exempt offering of securities with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
  Form D contains basic information about the offering and the company.


Form D Filings


Filing Date
Form Type
Industry Group
Securities Offered
Total Offering Amount
Total Amount Sold
Total Remaining




2009-10-27
D
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  OTHER INVESTMENT FUND

      Pooled Investment Fund Interests
    
INDEFINITE
42,831,177
INDEFINITE




Other Issuers in Filings


Name
Address





  No Other Issuers
  




Related Parties included in filings


Name
Address
Relationship




ESTHER ECKERLING  GOODMAN

          subscription required
    


          EXECUTIVE OFFICER
      



KENNETH ANDREW  SHEWER

          subscription required
    


          EXECUTIVE OFFICER
      



LAWRENCE STEVEN  BLOCK

          subscription required
    


          EXECUTIVE OFFICER
      



MARC STEVEN  GOODMAN

          subscription required
    


          EXECUTIVE OFFICER
      



MAUREEN DANIELLE  HOWLEY

          subscription required
    


          EXECUTIVE OFFICER
      











Elevate your investments
Try it for free























LLC Operating Agreement, LLC Operating Contracts - Free Legal Documents (page 1 Of 137)

















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > LLC Operating Agreement    

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents













SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>




 Legal professionals use RealDealDocs to gather competitive intelligence, draft documents and to find specific information about transactions within a particular industry or sector, and you can too. These are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their clients. You can view sample LLC operating contracts or download LLC operating agreements from RealDealDocs. We have thousands of sample LLC operating agreements, and millions of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free. Finding relevant agreements to use in your own work no longer has to be difficult, confusing or expensive. The many sample LLC operating agreements from RealDealDocs have been drafted by top law firms from across the United States and around the world, and they can save you or your company valuable time and money when you need a reliable LLC operating contract or template in a hurry. Benefit from the work of those that have gone before you, and leverage the efforts and thinking of the best lawyers from the top law firms and Fortune 500 companies, without all the hassle or expense. Download LLC operating agreements from RealDealDocs today for the quick and easy way to use millions of legal agreements and clauses from top law firms across the US and around the world to your advantage. To view any of the sample LLC operating contracts below, simply click on its title. For advanced search click here. 



LLC Operating Agreements 





	These LLC Operating Agreements are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their clients. Use them for competitive intelligence, drafting documents or to get information about transactions within a particular industry or sector. We have millions of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free.	



1) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OPERATING AGREEMENTParties: TRILINC GLOBAL IMPACT FUND LLC | TRILINC ADVISORS, LLC | TRILINC GLOBAL IMPACT FUND, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
2) THE SIXTH AMENDED AND RESTATED OPERATING AND MEMBER CONTROL AGREEMENT OF GRANITE FALLS ENERGY, LLCParties: GRANITE FALLS ENERGY, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/29/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Minnesota
3) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF SPARTAN MERGER SUB 2, LLCParties: SURGICAL CARE AFFILIATES, INC. | Spartan Merger Sub 2, LLC | UNITEDHEALTH GROUP INCORPORATED 
								
								Document Date: 3/24/2017

4) AMENDMENT NO. 2 TO FIFTH AMENDED AND RESTATED LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF CENTENNIAL RESOURCE PRODUCTION, LLCParties: CENTENNIAL RESOURCE DEVELOPMENT, INC. | Centennial Resource Development, Inc | CENTENNIAL RESOURCE PRODUCTION, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
5) OPERATING AGREEMENT OF GK SERVICES, LLCParties: GK SERVICES INC | Cintas Corporation | GK Services, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/22/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Minnesota
6) AMENDMENT NO. 4 TO THE AMENDED AND RESTATED LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF SHEPHERD'S FINANCE, LLC AUTHORIZING SERIES C CUMULATIVE REDEEMABLE PREFERRED UNITSParties: SHEPHERD'S FINANCE, LLC | Investor's Mark Acquisitions, LLC | SK Funding, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/21/2017

7) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OPERATING AGREEMENT OF LAGOON LLCParties: WESTLAKE MANAGEMENT SERVICES, INC. | Lagoon LLC | Westlake Chemical Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
8) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF WESTLAKE NG V LLCParties: WESTLAKE CHEMICAL INVESTMENTS, INC. | WESTECH BUILDING PRODUCTS, INC | WESTLAKE NG V LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
9) AMENDMENT TO LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: WESTLAKE MANAGEMENT SERVICES, INC. | Westlake Building Products, Inc | Westlake NG V LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
10) FIRST AMENDMENT TO LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF WESTLAKE STYRENE LLCParties: WESTLAKE CHEMICAL INVESTMENTS, INC. | Westlake Chemical Holdings, Inc | Westlake Chemical Investments, Inc | Westlake Olefins Corporation | WESTLAKE STYRENE LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
11) FIRST AMENDMENT TO LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF WESTLAKE STYRENE LLCParties: WESTLAKE MANAGEMENT SERVICES, INC. | Westlake Chemical Holdings, Inc | Westlake Chemical Investments, Inc | Westlake Olefins Corporation | WESTLAKE STYRENE LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
12) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OPERATING AGREEMENT OF LAGOON LLCParties: WESTLAKE CHEMICAL INVESTMENTS, INC. | Lagoon LLC | Westlake Chemical Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
13) AMENDMENT TO LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: WESTLAKE CHEMICAL INVESTMENTS, INC. | Westlake Building Products, Inc | Westlake NG V LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
14) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF WESTLAKE NG V LLCParties: WESTLAKE MANAGEMENT SERVICES, INC. | WESTECH BUILDING PRODUCTS, INC | WESTLAKE NG V LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
15) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY COMMUNITIES CONSTRUCTION, LLC, a Utah limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES CONSTRUCTION, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | UTAH REVISED UNIFORM LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

16) OPERATING AGREEMENTParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES SOUTHEAST, LLC | Its Manager, CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
17) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT OBSERVATORY HEIGHTS , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | OBSERVATORY HEIGHTS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
18) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR WESTOWN CONDOMINIUMS , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | WESTOWN CONDOMINIUMS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
19) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR B, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | AVR B, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
20) Limited Liability Company Agreement of Donnelley Financial, LLCParties: DONNELLEY FINANCIAL SOLUTIONS, INC. | DF LLC | Donnelley Financial, LLC | R R Donnelley  Sons Company 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
21) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR A, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
22) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR HOMETOWN SOUTH , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | HOMETOWN SOUTH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
23) AMENDED  RESTATED OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR WESTOWN TOWNHOMES , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | WESTOWN TOWNHOMES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
24) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR THE RETREAT AT RIDGEGATE LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | RIDGEGATE, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
25) OPERATING AGREEMENTParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | UTAH REVISED LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY | UTAH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

26) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR A, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
27) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT STERLING RANCH, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | STERLING RANCH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
28) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR C, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | AVR C, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
29) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR C, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | AVR C, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
30) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT LANDMARK , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | LANDMARK, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
31) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT CLAREMONT RANCH, LLC a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | CLAREMONT RANCH, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
32) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY COMMUNITIES CONSTRUCTION, LLC, a Utah limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES CONSTRUCTION, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | UTAH REVISED UNIFORM LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

33) AMENDED  RESTATED OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR WESTOWN TOWNHOMES , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | WESTOWN TOWNHOMES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
34) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR B, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | AVR B, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
35) OPERATING AGREEMENTParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | UTAH REVISED LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY | UTAH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

36) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT CLAREMONT RANCH, LLC a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | CLAREMONT RANCH, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
37) OPERATING AGREEMENT OF CENTURY COMMUNITIES OF UTAH, LLCParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | Century Communities, Inc | Utah Revised Uniform Limited Liability Company | UTAH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

38) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT LANDMARK , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | LANDMARK, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
39) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT OBSERVATORY HEIGHTS , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | OBSERVATORY HEIGHTS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
40) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR THE RETREAT AT RIDGEGATE LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | RIDGEGATE, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
41) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR WESTOWN CONDOMINIUMS , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | WESTOWN CONDOMINIUMS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
42) OPERATING AGREEMENT OF CENTURY COMMUNITIES OF UTAH, LLCParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | Century Communities, Inc | Utah Revised Uniform Limited Liability Company | UTAH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

43) OPERATING AGREEMENTParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES SOUTHEAST, LLC | Its Manager, CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
44) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT STERLING RANCH, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | STERLING RANCH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
45) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR HOMETOWN SOUTH , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | HOMETOWN SOUTH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
46) Burlington Northern Santa Fe, LLC UNDERWRITING AGREEMENT March 6, 2017Parties: BURLINGTON NORTHERN SANTA FE, LLC | JP Morgan Securities LLC | Morgan Stanley  Co LLC | Wells Fargo Securities, LLC 
								Law Firm: Cravath Swaine;Baker Botts
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
47) MRC P ERMIAN LKE C OMPANY , LLC LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM DELAWARE, LLC | LONGWOOD GATHERING AND DISPOSAL SYSTEMS GP, INC | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems, LP | MRC Permian LKE Company, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
48) LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM HOLDINGS , LLC COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM SOUTH TEXAS, LLC | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems GP, Inc | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems, LP | LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM HOLDINGS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
49) MRC P ERMIAN LKE C OMPANY , LLC LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM HOLDINGS, LLC | LONGWOOD GATHERING AND DISPOSAL SYSTEMS GP, INC | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems, LP | MRC Permian LKE Company, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
50) LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM HOLDINGS , LLC COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM DELAWARE, LLC | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems GP, Inc | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems, LP | LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM HOLDINGS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
 




Browse by StateGo directly to a specific page of results:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839404142434445464748495051525354555657585960616263646566676869707172737475767778798081828384858687888990919293949596979899100101102103104105106107108109110111112113114115116117118119120121122123124125126127128129130131132133134135136137 
 
 

 


















Amended And Restated 

Limited Liability Company 

Operating Agreement - Llc Operating Agreement  - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > LLC Operating Agreement     > AMENDED AND RESTATED 

LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY 

OPERATING AGREEMENT

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Amended And Restated 

Limited Liability Company 

Operating Agreement
LLC Operating Agreement 



You are currently viewing:
 This LLC Operating Agreement involves WORLD MONITOR TRUST II SERIES E | KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC . RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: AMENDED AND RESTATED 

LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY 

OPERATING AGREEMENT Governing Law: Delaware      Date: 6/3/2010 









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day









Exhibit 10.12
 


 


KMP FUTURES FUND I
LLC
 


 


A MENDED AND R ESTATED

L IMITED L IABILITY C OMPANY

O PERATING A GREEMENT

J ANUARY  1, 2010



KMP FUTURES FUND I
LLC

AMENDED AND
RESTATED

LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY
OPERATING AGREEMENT

TABLE OF CONTENTS
 













 


 


 


  


 


  



Page




1.


 


GENERAL
PROVISIONS


  



1





 


1.1


  


F ORMATION


  



1





 


1.2


  


N AME


  



1





 


1.3


  


P URPOSE


  



2





 


1.4


  


P RINCIPAL P LACE O F B USINESS A ND R EGISTERED O FFICES


  



2





 


1.5


  


T ERM


  



2









2.


 


CERTAIN
DEFINITIONS


  



2









3.


 


MEMBERS,
CAPITAL CONTRIBUTIONS, ADDITIONAL CAPITAL CONTRIBUTIONS, CAPITAL
ACCOUNTS, ALLOCATIONS, WITHDRAWAL RIGHTS AND
DISTRIBUTIONS


  



6





 


3.1


  


M EMBERS


  



6





 


3.2


  


C APITAL C ONTRIBUTIONS


  



6





 


3.3


  


A DDITIONAL C APITAL C ONTRIBUTIONS


  



6





 


3.4


  


N O A DDITIONAL C ONTRIBUTIONS R EQUIRED


  



6





 


3.5


  


C APITAL A CCOUNTS


  



6





 


3.6


  


A DJUSTMENTS TO B OOK C APITAL A CCOUNTS


  



7





 


3.7


  


A DJUSTMENTS TO T AX C APITAL A CCOUNTS


  



8





 


3.8


  


D ETERMINATION AND A LLOCATION OF P ROFITS , L OSSES AND C ERTAIN D EDUCTIONS


  



8





 


3.9


  


D ETERMINATION AND A LLOCATION OF C APITAL G AIN AND C APITAL L OSS


  



8





 


3.10


  


A DMISSION OF MEMBERS ; T RANSFERS


  



9





 


3.11


  


L IABILITY OF C ERTAIN T AXES


  



9





 


3.12


  


D ESIGNATION OF S PECIAL M EMBERS


  



9





 


3.13


  


W ITHDRAWALS (R EDEMPTIONS ) BY M EMBERS


  



10





 


3.14


  


D ISTRIBUTIONS


  



12









4.


 


FEES AND
EXPENSES


  



12





 


4.1


  


F EES AND E XPENSES OF THE F UND


  



12





 


4.2


  


M ANAGING M EMBER O BLIGATIONS


  



13









5.


 


MANAGEMENT


  



13





 


5.1


  


M ANAGEMENT OF F UND B USINESS


  



13





 


5.2


  


P OWERS OF THE M ANAGING M EMBER


  



13





 


5.3


  


R ESTRICTIONS ON M ANAGING M EMBER ’ S A UTHORITY


  



16





 


5.4


  


L IABILITY AND I NDEMNIFICATION


  



16





 


5.5


  


D ETERMINATION BY M ANAGING M EMBER OF C ERTAIN M ATTERS


  



17





 


5.6


  


C ONFLICTS D ERIVED BY D UAL S TATUS OF THE M ANAGING M EMBER


  



17





 


5.7


  


I NSURANCE


  



17





 


5.8


  


V OLUNTARY W ITHDRAWAL BY THE M ANAGING M EMBER


  



18









6.


 


RIGHTS AND
OBLIGATIONS OF MEMBERS


  



18





 


6.1


  


L IMITATIONS ON M EMBERS


  



18





 


6.2


  


R IGHTS OF M EMBERS


  



18





 


6.3


  


L IABILITY OF M EMBERS


  



18





 


6.4


  


M EETINGS ; C ONSENTS


  



19





 


6.5


  


O THER B USINESS OF M EMBERS


  



19




 
i



KMP FUTURES FUND I
LLC

AMENDED AND
RESTATED

LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY
OPERATING AGREEMENT

TABLE OF CONTENTS

(continued)
 













 


 


 


  


 


  



Page




7.


 


BOOKS, RECORDS AND REPORTS


  



19





 


7.1


  


B OOKS AND R ECORDS


  



19





 


7.2


  


A CCOUNTING B ASIS


  



20





 


7.3


  


R EPORTS


  



20





 


7.4


  


T AX I NFORMATION


  



20









8.


 


ADMISSION OF NEW MEMBERS


  



20





 


8.1


  


A DDITIONAL MEMBERS


  



20





 


8.2


  


A DDITIONAL M ANAGING M EMBERS


  



21









9.


 


TRANSFERABILITY, ASSIGNMENT, PLEDGES AND
SUBSTITIONS


  



21





 


9.1


  


R ESTRICTIONS


  



21





 


9.2


  


S UBSTITUTED M EMBERS


  



22





 


9.3


  


T RANSFER OF F UND I NTEREST BY M ANAGING M EMBER


  



22









10.


 


DISSOLUTION, LIQUIDATION AND TERMINATION OF THE
FUND


  



23





 


10.1


  


D ISSOLUTION


  



23





 


10.2


  


L IQUIDATION


  



23









11.


 


AMENDMENTS


  



24





 


11.1


  


P ERMITTED A MENDMENTS


  



24





 


11.2


  


A MENDMENTS R EQUIRING C ONSENT OF M EMBERS


  



25





 


11.3


  


A MENDMENTS N OT R EQUIRING C ONSENT OF M EMBERS


  



25





 


11.4


  


N OTICE OF A MENDMENTS


  



25









12.


 


POWERS OF ATTORNEY


  



25





 


12.1


  


A PPOINTMENT


  



25





 


12.2


  


C OUPLED WITH AN I NTEREST


  



26





 


12.3


  


E XECUTION AND D ELIVERY


  



26









13.


 


REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, COVENANTS AND
UNDERSTANDINGS OF MEMBERS


  



27









14.


 


CONFIDENTIALITY


  



27









15.


 


MISCELLANEOUS


  



27





 


15.1


  


N OTICE


  



27





 


15.2


  


G OVERNING L AW


  



27





 


15.3


  


A RBITRATION


  



27





 


15.4


  


E NTIRE A GREEMENT


  



28





 


15.6


  


HEADINGS


  



28





 


15.7


  


L EGENDS


  



28





 


15.8


  


N O T HIRD P ARTY B ENEFICIARIES


  



28





 


15.9


  


C OUNTERPARTS


  



28





 


15.10


  


C REDITORS


  



29





 


15.11


  


S EVERABILITY


  



29




 

















ADDITIONAL MEMBERS


  



APPENDIX I




 
ii



AMENDED AND
RESTATED

LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY
OPERATING AGREEMENT

OF

KMP FUTURES FUND I
LLC

This Amended and Restated Limited
Liability Company Operating Agreement dated as of January 1,
2010, is entered into between KENMAR PREFERRED INVESTMENTS CORP., a
Delaware corporation (the “ Managing Member ”),
as managing member, and DIVERSIFIED FUTURES TRUST I, a Delaware
business trust, FUTURES STRATEGIC TRUST, a Delaware business trust,
WORLD MONITOR TRUST II – SERIES D, a Delaware business trust,
WORLD MONITOR TRUST II – SERIES F a Delaware business trust,
and such other person or persons as may become parties to this
Agreement, as members (each a “ Member ,” and
collectively with the Managing Member, the “ Members
”).

WHEREAS , the parties have previously established WCM
Pool LLC) (the “ Fund ”) as a limited liability
company under the Act and have previously entered into that certain
Organization Agreement of the Fund dated as of November 26,
2006, as amended by Amendment No. 1 thereto dated
March 30, 2007 and Amendment No. 2 thereto dated
March 31, 2009, (collectively, the “ Prior
Agreement ”); and

WHEREAS , WCM Pool LLC changed its name to “KMP
Futures Fund I LLC” by filing a Certificate of Name Change
with Delaware Secretary of State on November 2, 2009;
and

WHEREAS , the parties desire to adopt certain amendments
to the Prior Agreement and to further amend and restate in its
entirety the Prior Agreement as more fully set forth
herein.

NOW, THEREFORE
, in consideration of the mutual
covenants hereinafter contained and for other good and valuable
consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby
acknowledged, the Members hereby agree as follows:
 



1.


GENERAL
PROVISIONS




1.1 F ORMATION

The Members have previously formed a
limited liability company under the provisions of the Act. The
rights and liabilities of the Members shall be as provided in the
Act except as herein otherwise expressly provided. The Members
shall cause to be executed and filed such further certificates,
notices, statements or other instruments required by law for the
operation of a limited liability company in all jurisdictions where
the Fund is required to qualify or be authorized to do business as
a foreign limited liability company, or as otherwise necessary to
carry out the purpose of this Agreement and the business of the
Fund.

1.2 N AME

The name of the Fund shall be KMP
Futures Fund I LLC, or such other name or names as the Managing
Member may determine in its sole and absolute discretion. The
Managing Member may from time to time change the name of the Fund
in its sole and absolute discretion.
 
1



1.3 P URPOSE

1.3.1 The Fund is formed to
(a) to engage in any lawful act or activity for which limited
liability companies may be organized under the laws of the State of
Delaware, including, but not limited to, the trading, both directly
and indirectly through investment in other investment funds, on
margin and otherwise, of Investments, and (b) to engage in all
other activities and transactions as are necessary, incidental or
ancillary to the foregoing. The objective of the Fund’s
business is the appreciation of its assets.

1.3.2 All purchases and sales of
permitted Investments shall be for the account and at the risk of
the Fund.

1.4 P RINCIPAL P LACE OF B USINESS AND R EGISTERED O FFICES

The principal place of business of
the Fund is 900 King Street, Suite 100, Rye Brook, New York 10573.
The Managing Member may from time to time change the principal
place of business of the Fund and may establish additional places
of business for the Fund when and where required by the business of
the Fund. The address of the registered office of the Fund in the
State of Delaware is c/o The Corporation Trust Company, Corporation
Trust Center, 1209 Orange Street, City of Wilmington, County of New
Castle, State of Delaware 19720 or such other locations as the
Managing Member may designate from time to time. The name and
address of the registered agent for service of process on the Fund
in the State of Delaware shall be The Corporation Trust Company,
Corporation Trust Center, 1209 Orange Street, City of Wilmington,
County of New Castle, State of Delaware 19720 or such other agent
as may be designated from time to time by the Managing
Member.

1.5 T ERM

The term of the Fund commenced on
the date the Certificate of Formation was filed with the Delaware
Secretary of State and shall continue until terminated as provided
in this Agreement.
 



2.


CERTAIN
DEFINITIONS




2.1 “ 1933 A CT ” means the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended.

2.2 “ 1940 A CT ” means the Investment Company Act of
1940.

2.3 “ A CCESS F UND ” means a partnership, corporation, trust
or other entity in which the Fund invests that in turn makes an
investment directly and/or indirectly in one or more Managed
Accounts.

2.4 “ A CCOUNTING P ERIOD ” means the period beginning on the next
day after the last Allocation Date and ending on the next following
Allocation Date.

2.5 “ A CT ” means the Delaware Limited Liability
Company Act, 6 Del. C. § 18-101 et seq
.

2.6 “ A DDITIONAL C ONTRIBUTION D ATE ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 3.3 hereof.

2.7 “ A DMINISTRATOR ” means the administrator of the Fund as
set forth in the Memorandum.

2.8 “ A FFILIATE ” has the meaning as defined in Regulation
S-X under the 1933 Act.

2.9 “ A GREEMENT ” means this Amended and Restated Limited
Liability Company Operating Agreement as it may be further amended
or restated from time to time.
 
2



2.10 “ A LLOCATION D ATE ” means whichever is applicable of the
last Business Day of each calendar month, the day immediately
preceding the date on which a Member is admitted to the Fund or
makes an additional Capital Contribution if that date is not the
first day of a calendar month, any Withdrawal (Redemption) Date
that is not the last Business Day of a calendar month, such other
day or days as the Managing Member may from time to time determine
either generally or in any particular case, or the date of
liquidation and dissolution of the Fund.

2.11 “ A LLOCATION F ORMULA ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 3.5 hereof.

2.12 “ A UTHORIZED R EPRESENTATIVES ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 14 hereof.

2.13 “ B OOK C APITAL A CCOUNT ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 3.5 hereof.

2.14 “ B USINESS D AY ” means a day (other than a Saturday or
Sunday) on which relevant financial markets are open for business
in New York.

2.15 “ B ROKER ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 5.2.2(vii) hereof.

2.16 “ C APITAL C ONTRIBUTION ” means the total amount contributed to
the Fund by each Member, from time to time, in accordance with the
terms hereof.

2.17 “ C APITAL G AIN ” means, for each Fiscal Year of the Fund,
the Fund’s net income or gain resulting from all sales or
other dispositions (including any deemed dispositions under the
Code) of capital assets during such Fiscal Year with respect to
which income, gain or loss is recognized for Federal income tax
purposes, taking into account in the computation thereof, all
capital gains reportable by the Fund for such Fiscal
Year.

2.18 “ C APITAL L OSS ” means, for each Fiscal Year of the Fund,
the Fund’s net loss resulting from all sales or other
dispositions (including any deemed dispositions under the Code) of
capital assets during such Fiscal Year with respect to which
income, gain or loss is recognized for Federal income tax purposes,
taking into account in the computation thereof, all capital losses
reportable by the Fund for such Fiscal Year.

2.19 “ CEA ” means the Commodity
Exchange Act, as amended.

2.20 “ C ODE ” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended.

2.21 “ C ONFIDENTIAL M ATTER ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 14 hereof.

2.22 “ ERISA ” means the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.

2.23 “ E VENT OF W ITHDRAWAL ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 10.1 hereof.

2.24 “ E XCLUDED I NVESTMENTS ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 3.6.2 hereof.

2.25 “ E XEMPT I NTEREST ” means an Interest that is owned by a
Special Member.

2.26 “ F ISCAL Y EAR ” of the Fund means the calendar
year.

2.27 “ F UND ” means KMP Futures Fund I LLC (formerly
known as WCM Pool LLC).

2.28 “ GAAP ” means U.S. generally
accepted accounting principles consistently applied under the
accrual method of accounting.
 
3



2.29 “ H ARDSHIPS ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 3.13.2 hereof.

2.30 “ I NTEREST ” means a Member’s participatory
share (obtained in consideration of each Capital Contribution) of
the profits, losses, distributions, capital and assets of the Fund.
On a percentage basis, an Interest is equal to the percentage
obtained by dividing (as of the date of determination) the Book
Capital Account balance of the Member whose Interest is being
determined by the total Book Capital Account balances of all
Members then outstanding. The dollar value of each Interest is
equal to the Book Capital Account balance of the Member whose
Interest is being calculated. Unless the context otherwise
requires, references to an “Interest” also shall
include an “Exempt Interest.” Interests may, but need
not be, evidenced by certificates and unless otherwise determined
by the Managing Member, shall each be of the same class and series.
The Managing Member may, without limitation, issue additional
classes or series of Interests having different investment and/or
other objectives from other Interests so long as the Managing
Member does not reduce the Book Capital Account of any existing
Member by doing so without such Member’s prior consent. In
the event the Managing Member determines to issue one or more
additional classes or series of Interests, (i) the Managing
Member is authorized to make such technical amendments to this
Agreement as it determines to be necessary to effectuate the
addition of such class(es) or series; (ii) the Fund shall
maintain separate and distinct records for all series;
(iii) the assets associated with each series shall be held
(directly or indirectly, including through a nominee or otherwise)
and accounted for separately from the assets of each other series;
(iv) the debts, liabilities and obligations incurred,
contracted for or otherwise existing with respect to a particular
series shall be enforceable against the assets of such series only,
and not against the assets of the Fund generally or any other
series and (v) none of the debts, liabilities, obligations and
expenses incurred, contracted for or otherwise existing with
respect to the Fund generally shall be enforceable against the
assets of any particular series. Each Member shall have only one
Interest in respect of all Capital Contributions made from time to
time by such Member to each class or series, which Interest shall
be calculated separately from each other Interest of a Member.
Interests may be sub-divided into “Units” for purposes
of reporting and keeping account of the value of each
Interest.

2.31 “ I NVESTMENTS ” means, without limitation, futures
contracts, options on futures contracts, forward contracts,
derivatives (such as swaps), and other instruments which lawfully
may be purchased and sold by the Fund, directly or indirectly,
under the CEA; stocks and other equity interests; bonds, notes and
other debt instruments; investment contracts; mutual fund shares
(both open and closed-end, whether public or private, and U.S. or
non-U.S.); options, warrants, privileges, participations, and
rights to acquire the same of public and private issuers throughout
the world; Access Funds, limited partnership interests, limited
liability company interests, and other interests pertaining to the
foregoing; and such other instruments or interests as the Managing
Member deems appropriate.

2.32 “ IRS ” means the Internal
Revenue Service.

2.33 “ JAMS ” has the meaning set
forth in Section 15.3.1.

2.34 “ L OSSES ” means, for each Fiscal Year of the Fund,
losses of the Fund as determined for Federal income tax purposes,
and each item of income, gain, loss or deduction entering into the
computation thereof, except that any deductions for Management Fees
charged against the Book Capital Account of any Interest pursuant
to Section 3.6.1(iv) hereof and any income, gain or loss taken
into account in determining the Capital Gain or the Capital Loss of
the Fund for such Fiscal Year shall not enter into such
computations.

2.35 “ M ANAGED A CCOUNT ” means a separately managed account
managed on behalf of the Fund (either directly or through an Access
Fund) by a Trading Advisor.

2.36 “ M ANAGEMENT F EE ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 4.1.3 hereof.
 
4



2.37 “ M ANAGING M EMBER ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 5.1 to this Agreement.

2.38 “ M ANAGING M EMBER AND ITS A FFILIATES ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 5.4.2 to this Agreement.

2.39 “ M EMBER ” means any person or entity who becomes a
member of the Fund and who is listed as such on the books and
records of the Fund, and may include the Managing Member with
respect to Membership Interests purchased by it.

2.40 “ M EMBERS ” means the Managing Member and such other
persons admitted to the Fund where no distinction is required by
the context in which the term is used.

2.41 “ N
ET A SSET V ALUE ” means at any date the total assets of
the Fund or any class of Interests, including all cash and cash
equivalents (valued at market plus accrued interest), accrued
interest and the fair market value of all Investments and other
assets, less all liabilities, with each determined on the basis of
GAAP. The method by which Net Asset Value (and the Net Asset Value
per Interest) will be calculated will be as set out in the
Memorandum.

2.42 “ M EMORANDUM ” means the Information Memorandum of the
Fund, amended and supplemented from time to time.

2.43 “ P RIOR A GREEMENT ” has the meaning specified in the first
WHEREAS clause herein.

2.44 “ P ROFITS ” means, for each Fiscal Year of the Fund,
profits of the Fund as determined for Federal income tax purposes,
and each item of income, gain, loss or deduction entering into the
computation thereof, excluding from such computation the items
described as being excluded from the computation of Losses in the
definition thereof.

2.45 “ R ECONSTITUTED F UND ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 10.1(i) hereof.

2.46 “ R EGULATIONS ” means the income tax regulations
promulgated under the Code, as such regulations may be amended from
time to time.

2.47 “ S PECIAL M EMBER ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 3.12 hereof.

2.48 “ S UBSCRIPTION A CCEPTANCE D ATE ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 3.2.1 hereof.

2.49 “ S UBSTITUTED M EMBER ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 9.2.1 hereof.

2.50 “ T AX C APITAL A CCOUNT ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 3.5 hereof.

2.51 “ T RADING A DVISOR ” means any person or entity engaged in
the business of investing, trading and/or speculating in
Investments (whether registered, exempt from registration or not
subject to registration) retained by the Fund, directly and/or
indirectly, to trade and/or invest a portion of the Fund’s
assets through an Access Fund or a Managed Account.

2.52 “ W ITHDRAWAL (R EDEMPTION ) D ATE ” means the last Business Day of each
month, or such other date(s) as the Managing Member in its sole
discretion shall determine.

2.53 “ W ITHDRAWAL (R EDEMPTION ) R EQUEST ” has the meaning set forth in
Section 3.13.1 hereof.
 
5





3.


MEMBERS,
CAPITAL CONTRIBUTIONS, ADDITIONAL CAPITAL CONTRIBUTIONS, CAPITAL
ACCOUNTS, ALLOCATIONS, WITHDRAWAL RIGHTS AND
DISTRIBUTIONS




3.1 M EMBERS

The names, residence addresses and
Capital Contributions of the Members shall be maintained by the
Managing Member with the records of the Fund.

3.2 C APITAL C ONTRIBUTIONS

3.2.1 The terms of the Interests,
the investor suitability requirements, and the minimum investment
for Members shall be determined by the Managing Member in its sole
discretion. Unless otherwise determined by the Managing Member in
its sole discretion, each new Member shall be admitted to the Fund
as of the first day of the month next succeeding the Managing
Member’s receipt of such person’s Capital Contribution
and such other documents or agreements as the Managing Member may
require, or such other date as the Managing Member shall determine
is appropriate (a “ Subscription Acceptance Date
”).

3.2.2 The Managing Member may
contribute such amount(s) as it shall determine and may receive in
return a Membership Interest. The Managing Member shall, with
respect to any Membership Interest owned by it, enjoy all of the
rights and privileges, and be subject to all of the obligations and
duties, of a Member, in addition to its other rights, privileges
and obligations under this Agreement.

3.2.3 No Member shall be paid
interest on any Capital Contribution that is unrelated to the
Fund’s investment activities.

3.2.4 No Member shall be personally
liable for the return or repayment of all or any portion of the
capital (or appreciation thereof) of any other Member, it being
expressly agreed that any such return of capital or appreciation
made pursuant to this Agreement shall be made solely from the
assets of the Fund without any right of contribution from any other
Member.

3.3 A DDITIONAL C APITAL C ONTRIBUTIONS

The Managing Member is authorized,
without the consent of the other Members, to permit any existing
Member to make an additional Capital Contribution upon such terms
and conditions as the Managing Member, in its sole discretion,
shall determine (an “ Additional Contribution Date
”). The terms and conditions under which any existing Member
may increase its Capital Contribution shall be subject to all the
provisions of this Agreement.

3.4 No A
DDITIONAL
C ONTRIBUTIONS R EQUIRED

No Member shall be required to make
any contributions to the capital of the Fund beyond the Capital
Contributions referred to in Section 3.2.1 or 3.2.2, except as
provided in Section 3.11, and except for the payment and
discharge of liabilities of the Fund attributable to any period
during which he is or was a Member to the extent of his Book
Capital Account.

3.5 C APITAL A CCOUNTS

There shall be established for each
outstanding class of Interest a book capital account (the “
Book Capital Account ”) and a tax capital account (the
“ Tax Capital Account ”) for the Capital
Contributions made by a Member. The balance of the Book and Tax
Capital Account for each Interest initially shall
 
6


equal the Capital Contribution made by a Member
to the Fund for such Interest in accordance with Section 3.2.
The balance of the Tax Capital Account for each Interest initially
shall equal the Capital Contribution. Thereafter, the Book and Tax
Capital Accounts for an Interest shall each be (a) increased
by any additional Capital Contributions made by such Member,
(b) reduced by the amount of any withdrawals (redemptions) or
distributions made with respect to such Interest pursuant to
Sections 3.13 and 3.14 hereof, and (c) further adjusted as
hereinafter provided in Section 3.6 (in the case of Book
Capital Accounts) and Section 3.7 (in the case of Tax Capital
Accounts). Increases or decreases in Book and Tax Capital Accounts
shall be made in accordance with the following formula (the “
Allocation Formula ”): unless otherwise provided in
Sections 3.6, 3.8 or 3.9 with respect to each category or class of
Interest, all Profits, Losses, Capital Gain and Capital Loss and
any other items of gain, income, deduction or loss for each
Accounting Period shall be allocated among all Interests in a class
in proportion to their respective Book Capital Account balances as
of the close of business on the applicable Allocation Date (prior
to making any allocations for such Accounting Period).

3.6 A DJUSTMENTS TO B OOK C APITAL A CCOUNTS

3.6.1 As of the close of business on
each Allocation Date during each Fiscal Year, prior to making the
allocations described in Sections 3.8 and 3.9 for such Fiscal Year,
the following determinations and adjustments to the Book Capital
Accounts of each class of Interest shall be made:

(i) The Net Asset Value of the Fund
(before deduction of the Management Fee) shall be
determined.

(ii) The difference between the
current Net Asset Value and the Net Asset Value at the end of the
preceding Accounting Period shall be allocated to Book Capital
Accounts in accordance with the Allocation Formula set forth in
Section 3.5.

(iii) Amounts paid or to be paid in
respect of any Interest withdrawn (redeemed) shall be charged
against the Book Capital Account maintained for such Member with
respect to the Interest as of the close of the applicable
Withdrawal (Redemption) Date, and amounts distributed or to be
distributed in respect of an Interest shall be charged against the
Book Capital Account maintained for such Member with respect to the
Interest as of the close of the applicable record date for the
distribution.

(iv) The Management Fee required to
be accrued pursuant to Section 4.1.2 hereof with respect to
each Interest that is subject to a Management Fee shall be
calculated, and all such required amounts shall be charged against
each Member’s Book Capital Account for the affected
Interest.

3.6.2 Notwithstanding anything to
the contrary, if the Managing Member determines that for legal,
tax, regulatory or other reasons, a Member cannot participate in
some or all of the Profit or Loss, if any, attributable to certain
Investments (collectively, “ Excluded Investments
”), the Fund shall allocate the Profit, Loss, and related
expenses for Excluded Investments only to the Book Capital Accounts
of Members who are permitted to invest in such
Investments.
 
7



3.7 A DJUSTMENTS TO T AX C APITAL A CCOUNTS

As of the close of each Fiscal Year,
the Tax Capital Account maintained for each Interest shall be
adjusted as follows:

(i) Each Tax Capital Account shall
be increased by the amount of Profits, and decreased by the amount
of Losses and deductions, allocated to such Interest pursuant to
Section 3.8.

(ii) Each Tax Capital Account shall
be decreased by the amount of any withdrawals or distributions made
in respect of such Interest during or with respect to such Fiscal
Year in accordance with Sections 3.13, 3.14 or 10.2
hereof.

(iii) Each Tax Capital Account shall
be increased by the amount of Capital Gain and decreased by the
amount of Capital Loss allocated to such Interest pursuant to
Section 3.9.

(iv) The Tax Capital Account
maintained for any Interest that is completely withdrawn (redeemed)
during a Fiscal Year shall be eliminated as of the first day of the
following Fiscal Year.

3.8 D ETERMINATION AND A LLOCATION OF P ROFITS , L OSSES AND C ERTAIN D EDUCTIONS

As of the close of each Fiscal Year,
the Profits and Losses of the Fund (and other items of gain,
income, deduction or loss, except for items specifically allocated
elsewhere in this Agreement) shall be determined for each
Accounting Period during such Fiscal Year. For Federal, State and
local income tax purposes, the Profits and Losses (and other items
of gain, income, deduction or loss, except for items specifically
allocated elsewhere in this Agreement) for each Accounting Period
shall be allocated in accordance with the related credits and
charges made against Book Capital Accounts pursuant to
Section 3.6.1.

3.9 D ETERMINATION AND A LLOCATION OF C APITAL G AIN AND C APITAL L OSS

As of the close of each Fiscal Year,
the Capital Gain and Capital Loss of the Fund shall be determined
for each Accounting Period during such Fiscal Year, and shall be
allocated as follows:

(i) For each Accounting Period (up
to the applicable Withdrawal (Redemption) Date for each Member
hereinafter described), Capital Gain may be allocated first to each
Member who has withdrawn (redeemed) all or any part of his Interest
during such Fiscal Year up to any excess of the Book Capital
Account over the Tax Capital Account maintained for the withdrawn
Interest at the time of such withdrawal (redemption). If the
Capital Gain to be so allocated to all Members who have withdrawn
(redeemed) Interests during a Fiscal Year is less than the excess
of all such Members, then Capital Gain shall be allocated among all
such Members in the ratio that each such Member’s excess
bears to the aggregate excess of all such Members.

(ii) Capital Gain remaining after
the allocation in clause (i) above shall be allocated among
all Members whose Book Capital Accounts are in excess of their Tax
Capital Accounts (after the adjustments in clause (i)) in the ratio
that each such Member’s excess bears to the aggregate excess
of all such Members.

(iii) Any remaining Capital Gain
shall be allocated among all Members in proportion to their
respective Book Capital Accounts.
 
8



(iv) For each Accounting Period (up
to the applicable Withdrawal (Redemption) Date for each Member
hereinafter described), Capital Loss may be allocated first to each
Member who has withdrawn (redeemed) all or any part of his Interest
during such Fiscal Year up to any excess of the Tax Capital Account
over the Book Capital Account maintained for the withdrawn Interest
at the time of such withdrawal (redemption). If the Capital Loss to
be so allocated to all Members who have withdrawn (redeemed) all or
any part of their Interests during a Fiscal Year is less than the
excess of all such Members, then Capital Loss shall be allocated
among all such Members in the ratio that each such Member’s
excess bears to the aggregate excess of all such
Members.

(v) Capital Loss remaining after the
allocation in clause (iv) above shall be allocated among all
Members whose Tax Capital Accounts are in excess of their Book
Capital Accounts (after the adjustments in clause (iv)) in the
ratio that each such Member’s excess bears in the aggregate
excess of all such Members.

(vi) Any remaining Capital Loss
shall be allocated among all Members in proportion to their
respective Book Capital Accounts.

The foregoing allocations of Capital
Gain and Capital Loss are intended to eliminate, to the extent
possible, any disparity between the Book Capital Account and the
Tax Capital Account for each Interest, consistent with the
principles set forth in Section 704(c) of the Code.

3.10 A DMISSION OF M EMBERS ; T RANSFERS

Members shall be deemed admitted,
additional Capital Contributions from existing Members shall be
accepted, and Tax and Book Capital Accounts shall be established,
with respect to the Interests established for each of the
foregoing, as of each Subscription Acceptance Date or Additional
Contributions Date, as appropriate, or as of the date on which a
transfer of Interests from a Member to another permitted person is
recognized, or as of the date of admission of a new Managing
Member. Any person to whom an Interest has been transferred shall
succeed to the Tax and Book Capital Accounts with respect to the
Interest transferred.

3.11 L IABILITY FOR C ERTAIN T AXES

In the event that the Fund shall be
deemed to be an entity separately subject to the state or local
income tax laws of any jurisdiction or taxing authority, each
Member shall be liable for any income taxes due and payable or paid
to such jurisdiction in accordance with the Allocation Formula set
forth in Section 3.5. The Managing Member is authorized to
deduct the amount of such taxes from such Member’s Book
Capital Account. The Member will remain liable for any deficiency
and, upon request of the Managing Member, shall promptly pay the
amount of such deficiency as requested by the Managing
Member.

3.12 D ESIGNATION OF S PECIAL M EMBERS

The Managing Member shall have the
authority to designate certain Members as special Members (each, a
“ Special Member ”). A Special Member shall have
the same rights and obligations as a Member, except that the
Interest held by a Special Member will, in the sole discretion of
the Managing Member (i) not be charged the same Management
Fee, and/or (ii) not be subject to the same withdrawal
(redemption) restrictions, and/or (iii) not be subject to such
other provisions as the Managing Member may specify. A Special
Member shall include, but not be limited to, (a) the Managing
Member, any member of the Managing Member or a director, officer,
or employee of the Managing Member or another person occupying a
similar position, and (b) such other persons as the Managing
Member in its sole discretion may designate. Each Special Member
shall be designated as a Special Member in the books
 
9


and records of the Fund, but shall not, unless
otherwise determined by the Managing Member, solely by virtue of
being a Special Member owning an Exempt Interest, be deemed to own
a separate class of Interest within the meaning of
Section 2.29 hereof. A Special Member may lose his/its
designation as a Special Member, at the sole discretion of the
Managing Member.

3.13 W ITHDRAWALS (R EDEMPTIONS ) BY M EMBERS

3.13.1 The Members recognize that
the profitability of the Fund depends upon long-term and
uninterrupted investment of capital. It is agreed, therefore, that
the Fund’s profits may be automatically reinvested and that
distributions of capital and profits, if any, to the Members shall
be on a limited basis, if at all. Nevertheless, the Members
contemplate the possibility that one or more of the Members may
elect to withdraw (redeem) capital prior to the termination or
dissolution of the Fund. Subject to the terms of this
Section 3.13.1, each Member shall have the right to make a
withdrawal (redemption), in whole or in part, from their Book
Capital Account only on a Withdrawal (Redemption) Date if written
notice of a withdrawal (redemption) in proper form (a
“Withdrawal (Redemption) Request”) is received at least
five (5) Business Days prior to the applicable Withdrawal
(Redemption) Date, or at such other date(s) or time(s) and upon
such terms and conditions as the Managing Member in its sole
discretion shall determine. The minimum amount of any
Withdrawal/Redemption Request is $1,000. If any Withdrawal
(Redemption) Date falls on a day other than a Business Day, the
Withdrawal (Redemption) Request will be honored on the first
Business Day prior to such Withdrawal (Redemption) Date. If a
Withdrawal (Redemption) Request is received after the deadline for
receipt of requests for withdrawal (redemption) for any particular
Withdrawal (Redemption) Date, it shall (unless otherwise determined
by the Managing Member) be treated as a request for withdrawal
(redemption) on the next Withdrawal (Redemption) Date. The Book
Capital Account of the Interest of the withdrawing (redeeming)
Member will be reduced by the withdrawing (redeeming)
Member’s share of all expenses of the Fund and any applicable
withdrawal (redemption) fees, as well as any expenses associated
with such withdrawal (redemption), including without limitation,
wire transfer fees and transactions costs. Withdrawal (redemption)
from the Fund shall be effective as of the close of business on the
applicable Withdrawal (Redemption) Date occurring after a timely
Withdrawal (Redemption) Request in proper form has been received
and accepted by the Managing Member.

3.13.2

(i) Withdrawal (redemption) payments
will be made in US Dollars. Subject to the restrictions on the
Fund’s ability to redeem set forth below, withdrawal
(redemption) payments will be made promptly (generally between ten
(10) and fifteen (15) Business Days) following the
applicable Withdrawal (Redemption) Date; provided, that all
liabilities, contingent or otherwise, of the Fund, have been paid
or there remains property sufficient to pay them; and provided
further, that under extraordinary circumstances as may be
determined by the Managing Member in its sole discretion, including
but not limited to, the inability to liquidate Investments as of a
Withdrawal (Redemption) Date, or a default or delay in payments due
the Fund from brokers, banks, or Investments in which the Fund is
invested, or from other persons, or the Managing Member decides in
the exercise of its reasonable discretion not to liquidate
Investments on a disadvantageous basis, or other significant
administrative or other hardships exist (collectively, “
Hardships ”), the Fund may delay payment to Members
making a Withdrawal (Redemption) Request of the proportionate part
of the value of the redeemed Interests represented by the sums that
are the subject of the default or delay. In such case, payment
shall be made as soon thereafter as practicable. Wire transfer fees
payable by the Fund will be deducted from the withdrawal
(redemption) proceeds payable to a withdrawing (redeeming) Member
unless the Managing Member otherwise determines. No interest shall
accrue on the withdrawal (redemption) proceeds pending payment. A
Member may revoke his notice of intent to redeem on or prior to the
Withdrawal (Redemption) Date by written instructions to the
Managing Member.
 
10



(ii) The foregoing withdrawal
(redemption) policy is subject to the Fund’s ability to
liquidate its Investments. If the Fund were unable to liquidate its
Investments, the Fund may redeem the Interests held by the
withdrawing (redeeming) Member to the extent possible.

3.13.3 The Managing Member may
suspend withdrawals (redemptions) by the Members in any Fiscal Year
in which the Managing Member determines that: (i) such
suspension is necessary in order to assure that the Fund will not
be treated as “publicly traded” under Code §7704,
and (ii) treatment as “publicly traded” would be
adverse to the Members. The Managing Member’s good faith
determinations pursuant to the preceding sentence shall be final
and conclusive as to all the Members. In addition, the Managing
Member may suspend withdrawals (redemptions) by the Members for the
whole or part of any Fiscal Year if the Managing Member determines
that (i) the effect of withdrawals (redemptions), including
withdrawals (redemptions) for which Withdrawal (Redemption)
Requests have been received, would be materially to impair the
Fund’s ability to operate in pursuit of its objectives, or
(ii) the remaining Members would be unfairly and materially
disadvantaged. In addition, the Managing Member may suspend the
withdrawals (redemptions) of Interests, including the right to
receive withdrawal (redemptions) proceeds and/or the issuance of
additional Interests and the determination of Net Asset Value, upon
the occurrence of any of the following circumstances (and in each
case for the whole or any part of a period):

(i) closure of any exchange on which
any Investment is normally dealt in or traded or exchanged, other
than customary holidays;

(iii restriction of trading on the
market on which any Investment of the Fund is normally dealt in or
traded;

(iii) the existence of an emergency
as a result of which, in the opinion of the Managing Member,
disposal of any Investment of the Fund is not reasonable or
practicable or it is not reasonable or practicable for the Fund
fairly to determine the Net Asset Value per Interest of the
Fund;

(iv) the inability of the Fund to
obtain the necessary information regarding the Fund’s
Investments; or

(v) the occurrence of a breakdown in
any of the means normally employed by the Managing Member in
ascertaining the price of any Investment attributed to the Fund or
when for any reason the price of any Investment attributed to the
Fund cannot reasonably be ascertained.

3.13.4 The Managing Member shall
have the right to withdraw (redeem) any portion of its Book Capital
Account at any time.

3.13.5 The Managing Member may
mandatorily redeem any Member upon at least ten (10) days
prior written notice if: (i) the Managing Member determines
that the continued participation of such Member might cause the
Fund to be deemed to be managing Plan Assets under ERISA,
(ii) there is an unauthorized assignment made by a Member, or
(iii) in the event that any transaction would or might violate
any law or constitute a prohibited transaction under ERISA or the
Code.
 
11



3.13.6 The Managing Member may, in
its sole discretion, upon such terms and conditions as it
establishes, expressly waive or amend any of the restrictions,
notice requirements, limitations or provisos regarding withdrawals
(redemptions) contained in this Agreement, including without
limitation, permitting a Member to make a withdrawal (redemption)
other than at a regularly scheduled Withdrawal (Redemption)
Date.

3.14 D ISTRIBUTIONS

3.14.1 The Managing Member shall
make distributions (i) in connection with the withdrawal
(redemption) of funds from the Fund by a Member and (ii) from
time to time as hereinafter provided in its sole and absolute
discretion.

3.14.2 The Managing Member will
distribute cash to the extent reasonably practicable, but may, in
its sole discretion, distribute assets in-kind in lieu of cash. No
Member shall, however, have the right to receive distributions in
property other than cash.

3.14.3 The Managing Member may
withhold from any amount payable to any Member, any taxes required
to be paid or withheld by the Fund on behalf of or for the account
of such Member. Any such taxes shall be deemed to be a distribution
or payment to such Member, reducing the amount otherwise
distributable to such Member pursuant to this Agreement and
reducing the Book Capital Account of such Member.

3.14.4 No distribution shall be made
in respect of any Interest to the extent that, after giving effect
to the distribution, all liabilities of the Fund, other than
liabilities to the Members on account of their Interests, exceed
the fair market value of the Fund’s assets. The aggregate
distributions made (other than constructive distributions described
in Section 3.14.3 hereof and distributions on termination,
which shall be made in the manner described in Section 10.2
hereof) shall be made in accordance with the Allocation Formula set
forth in Section 3.5 and paid to the holders of record of such
Interests.

3.14.5 No Member shall have the
status of, or be entitled to the remedies available to a creditor
of the Fund with respect to distributions.
 



4.


FEES AND
EXPENSES




4.1 F EES AND E XPENSES OF THE F UND

4.1.1 The Fund will bear all
(i) legal, bookkeeping, accounting, custodial, administration
(including, without limitation, the costs and expenses of the
Administrator), auditing, tax preparation charges and related
charges of the Fund (including reimbursement of the Managing Member
on a reasonable time-spent basis, for certain legal, accounting,
administrative and registrar and transfer agent work
perfor


 








 














	KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC - 10-Q - Management's Discussion and Analysis of




































 










 
 



 















     
Industry News


Contact























 From our Industry Experts













Tweet

























[August 15, 2011]


KMP FUTURES FUND I LLC - 10-Q - Management's Discussion and Analysis of

(Edgar Glimpses Via Acquire Media NewsEdge) Financial Condition and Results of Operations

This report on Form 10-Q (the "Report") for the quarter ending June 30, 2011
("Second Quarter 2011") includes forward-looking statements that reflect the
current expectation of Kenmar Preferred Investments Corp., the managing member
of KMP Futures Fund I LLC, about the future results, performance, prospects and
opportunities of Registrant. The managing member has tried to identify these
forward-looking statements by using words such as "may," "will," "expect,"
"anticipate," "believe," "intend," "should," "estimate" or the negative of those
terms or similar expressions. These forward-looking statements are based on
information currently available to the managing member and are subject to a
number of risks, uncertainties and other factors, both known, such as those
described in this Report, and unknown, that could cause Registrant's actual
results, performance, prospects or opportunities to differ materially from those
expressed in, or implied by, these forward-looking statements.


 





 


You should not place undue reliance on any forward-looking statements. Except as
expressly required by the Federal securities laws, the managing member
undertakes no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking
statements or the risks, uncertainties or other factors described in this
Report, as a result of new information, future events or changed circumstances
or for any other reason after the date of this Report.

Introduction

General

KMP Futures Fund I LLC ("Registrant"), formerly known as WCM Pool LLC prior to
its change in name effective November 2, 2009, is a limited liability company
organized under the laws of Delaware on November 20, 2006 which commenced
operations on January 1, 2007. Registrant will terminate on December 31, 2056
unless terminated sooner under the provisions of the Organization Agreement.
Registrant was formed to engage in the speculative trading of a diversified
portfolio of futures contracts, options on futures contracts and forward
currency contracts and may, from time to time, engage in cash and spot
transactions. The fiscal year end of Registrant is December 31.

As of December 31, 2009, the Registrant had four members: Diversified Futures
Trust I ("Member DFT I"), Futures Strategic Trust ("Member FST"), World Monitor
Trust II Series D ("Member Series D") and World Monitor Trust II Series F
("Member Series F") (collectively, the "Members"). On April 1, 2009, Member
Series D and Member Series F received a voting membership interest in
Registrant. Member DFT I and Member FST were members of Registrant since 2007.
Kenmar Global Trust ("Member KGT") was a member of Registrant from 2007 to
September 2009. Effective September 30, 2009, Member KGT fully redeemed from
Registrant.

On November 2, 2009, pursuant to each Member's Trust Agreement, the managing
member of the Members determined to dissolve the Members effective close of
business on December 31, 2009. The managing member also converted Registrant
from an aggregate trading vehicle to a direct investment vehicle and filed with
the Securities Exchange Commission ("SEC") to register the Registrant under the
Securities and Exchange Act of 1934. Investors in the Members who elected not to
redeem their units in the Registrant at December 31, 2009 were mandatorily
redeemed from such Member effective close of business December 31, 2009 and
received a direct ownership Interest in the Registrant beginning January 1, 2010
equal to their pro rata indirect interest in Registrant as of close of business
December 31, 2009. Each Member filed with the SEC on January 5, 2010 to
de-register its Units under Section 12(g) of the Exchange Act. The Members were
no longer subject to the reporting requirements of the SEC and Commodity Futures
Trading Commission ("CFTC") upon their dissolution on December 31, 2009.

Effective July 1, 2010, World Monitor Trust II - Series E ("Member Series E"),
pursuant to its Trust Agreement, the managing owner of Member Series E
determined to dissolve Member Series E effective close of business
September 30, 2010. Investors in Members Series E who elected not to redeem
prior to September 30, 2010 were mandatorily redeemed from Member Series E
effective close of business September 30, 2010 and received direct ownership
Interest in Registrant equal to their pro rata indirect interest in Registrant
as of close of business September 30, 2010.

Effective December 1, 2010, Member KGT contributed all of its assets into
Registrant and received a voting membership interest. On December 10, 2010,
pursuant to Member KGT's Fifth Amended and Restated Declaration of Trust and
Trust Agreement, the Board of Directors of Kenmar Preferred, in its capacity as
managing owner of Member KGT, determined to dissolve Member KGT effective as of
the close of business on December 31, 2010 (date of termination). Investors in
Member KGT who elected not to redeem as of December 31, 2010 (date of
termination) received a pro rata distribution of their interest in Member KGT on
December 31, 2010 and replaced it with a direct ownership interest in Registrant
on January 1, 2011.

 25

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Member Series E and Member KGT, filed a form 15 with the SEC on October 5, 2010
and January 6, 2011, respectively, to de-register their respective interests
under Section 12(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Member Series E and
Member KGT are no longer subject to the reporting requirements of the SEC and
the CFTC upon their dissolution on September 30, 2010 and December 31, 2010,
respectively.

Registrant is a reporting company pursuant to the Exchange Act. Moreover, as a
commodity pool, Registrant is subject to the record keeping and reporting
requirements of the CFTC and the National Futures Association ("NFA").

Registrant's Objectives

Registrant's objectives are:

 • Significant profits over time;

 • Performance volatility commensurate with profit potential;

 • Controlled risk of loss; and

 • Diversification within a traditional portfolio, typically consisting
 entirely of "long" equity and debt positions and reduced dependence on
 a single nation's economy, by accessing global financial, commodity
 and other non-financial futures markets.

Registrant's potential for aggressive capital growth arises from the profit
possibilities offered by the global futures, forward and options markets and the
skills of the professional trading organization(s) selected to manage the assets
of Registrant. The fact that Registrant can profit from both rising and falling
markets adds an element of profit potential that is not present in long-only
strategies. However, Registrant can also incur losses from both rising and
falling markets that adds to the risk of loss. In addition to its profit
potential and risk of loss, Registrant also could help reduce the overall
volatility, or risk, of a portfolio. By investing in markets that operate
independently from U.S. stock and bond markets (and therefore, may be considered
as non-correlated), Registrant may provide positive returns even when U.S. stock
and bond markets are experiencing flat to negative performance and may provide
negative returns even when U.S. stock and bond markets are experiencing flat to
positive performance. Non-correlation should not be confused with negative
correlation, where the performance would be exactly opposite between Registrant
and U.S. stock and bond markets.

The managing member makes no guarantee that the investment objectives for
Registrant will be achieved.

Past performance is not necessarily indicative of future results.

Managing Member and its Affiliates

Kenmar Preferred Investments Corp. ("Kenmar Preferred" or the "Managing Member")
is the Managing Member of the Registrant.

The Managing Member's predecessor and affiliates have been sponsoring and
managing single and multi-advisor funds for over two decades. The principal
office of Registrant is c/o Kenmar Preferred Investments Corp., 900 King Street,
Suite 100, Rye Brook, New York 10573. The telephone number of Registrant and the
Managing Member is (914) 307-7000.

The Managing Member has substantial experience in selecting and monitoring
trading advisors, asset allocation and overall portfolio design using
quantitative and qualitative methods.

The Managing Member monitors the trading activity and performance of the trading
advisors and adjusts the overall leverage at which Registrant trades. The
commitment of Registrant to the trading advisors may exceed 100% of Registrant's
total equity if the Managing Member decides to strategically allocate notional
equity to such trading advisors. This may result in increased profits or larger
losses than would otherwise result. There likely will be periods in the markets
during which it is unlikely that the trading advisors will be profitable. By
having the ability to leverage Registrant's market commitment to below

 26

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

its actual equity during such periods, the Managing Member could help preserve
capital while awaiting more favorable market cycles. The Managing Member
currently does not intend to use notional equity.

The Managing Member also performs ongoing due diligence with respect to the
trading advisors. If the Managing Member determines that the trading advisors
have departed from its program or stated trading methodology or has exceeded its
stated risk parameters, the Managing Member, on behalf of Registrant, will take
such actions as it deems appropriate, which may include terminating the trading
advisors. Similarly, if the Managing Member's ongoing due diligence leads the
Managing Member to determine that it is in the best interests of Registrant to
add an additional trading advisor; it will do so in its sole discretion. If the
Managing Member concludes, based upon its perception of market or economic
conditions, that it is appropriate to allocate assets of Registrant to a
different trading program run by the trading advisors, it will do so. The
Managing Member may select a replacement if any of the trading advisors resign
or are terminated, or may select additional advisors at its discretion.

The Trading Advisors

Trading for Registrant is directed by Winton Capital Management Limited
("Winton") pursuant to its Diversified Program and Graham Capital Management,
L.P. ("Graham") pursuant to its K4D-15V Program (collectively Winton and Graham
are referred to as the 'Trading Advisors").

Background of Winton and its Trading and Operational Principals

Winton, a limited liability company registered in England and Wales, became
registered with the CFTC as a commodity trading advisor ("CTA"), in January 1998
and as a commodity pool operator in December 1998. It is also a member of the
NFA and is authorized and regulated by the Financial Services Authority in the
United Kingdom (the "FSA").

Winton has its principal office and maintains all books and records at 1-5 St.
Mary Abbot's Place, London W8 6LS, United Kingdom. Its telephone number is
011-44-20-7610-5350 and its fax number is 011-44-20-7610-5301.

Winton's principals are David W. Harding, Martin J. Hunt, Anthony H. Daniell,
Matthew Beddall, Rajeev Patel, Andrew Bastow, Osman Murgian and two of his
family-owned companies, Amur (Jersey) Limited and Samur (Jersey) Limited.

On 31 July 2007, a company affiliated with Goldman Sachs International purchased
a 9.99 per cent shareholding interest in Winton. This shareholding is currently
held by Goldman Sachs Petershill Non-U.S. Master Fund, L.P. (the "GS
Shareholder"), a fund managed by Goldman Sachs Asset Management International.
The GS Shareholder is not involved in the day-to-day management of Winton but,
pursuant to a shareholders' agreement, has the right to approve certain limited
matters relating to Winton's operations.

The biographies of its principals follow:

David Winton Harding, Founder and Chairman. Winton was founded by David Winton
Harding, Martin Hunt and Osman Murgian and started trading in October 1997.
Mr. Harding is one of the pioneers of trend-following systematic trading in
Europe. Whilst at Winton, Mr. Harding has been registered with the National
Futures Association as an Associated Person, Associate Member and Principal of
Winton from January 1998.

Mr. Harding was born in Oxford in 1961 and graduated from Cambridge University
with a First Class Honours degree in Natural Sciences specializing in
Theoretical Physics. In September 1982, he joined stockbroker Wood MacKenzie as
a graduate trainee and became involved with futures trading just as the London
International Financial Futures Exchange ("LIFFE"), opened. A year later, in
September 1983, he left Wood MacKenzie and moved to Johnson Matthey & Wallace, a
commodity futures broker, where he was involved in gilt trading and sales. When
that company closed due to the failure of its parent company, in November 1984
Mr. Harding left it and joined Sabre Fund Management, one of the UK's first CTAs
where he was registered with the NFA as an Associate Member from April 1986
until July 1988 and as an Associated Person from May 1986 until July 1988. In
his new position, for the first time, Mr. Harding was able to apply his
scientific training to develop techniques for trading a wide variety of futures
markets.

In November 1986, Mr. Harding left Sabre Fund Management and joined Brockham
Securities, the Adam Family sugar trading company, where he assisted in
development and marketing of futures fund management services. In February 1987
he left to form Adam, Harding and Lueck Ltd ("AHL"). AHL brought together the
programming and system development abilities of Michael Adam and Martin Lueck
with Mr. Harding's research and marketing skills. AHL rapidly became the UK's

 27

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

most successful CTA and in 1989, The Man Group PLC (formerly ED&F Man PLC)
acquired a 51% stake and began distributing AHL's products globally. Over the
next five years, the three principals built a firm with assets under management
of $300 million and a staff of nearly 100, including research teams developing
mathematical and statistical trading strategies. AHL is still the flagship fund
of The Man Group which is a FTSE 100 Company. Mr. Harding was registered with
the National Futures Association as an Associate Member and Associated Person of
Man AHL USA Corp from July 1988 until January 1996. He was also registered as a
Principal of Man AHL USA Corp from July 1988 until February 1995.

In 1993, David Harding was invited to present a paper to a special symposium of
London's prestigious Royal Society, on the subject "Making Money from
Mathematical Models." This paper was subsequently incorporated into two books.

In 1994, ED&F Man Group floated on the London Stock Exchange and acquired the
remaining 49% of AHL. Mr. Harding then formed and ran Man Quantitative Research,
an in-house advanced statistical research team until August 1996.

In August 1996 Mr. Harding left ED&F Man Group and took leave until February
1997. In February 1997, he co-founded Winton with Martin Hunt and Osman Murgian,
one of AHL's early shareholders. Mr. Harding continues to lead Winton's research
efforts.

Mr. Harding is also a trustee of the Winton Charitable Foundation, which in 2007
endowed the Winton Professorship of the Public Understanding of Risk in the
Department of Pure Mathematics and Mathematical Statistics at Cambridge
University. Similarly, in 2008, the David Harding Foundation endowed the David
Harding Centre for Risk Literacy at the Max Planck Institute in Berlin, Germany.

Osman Murgian, Director. Mr. Murgian, born in 1934, is a founding director of
Winton. Educated at Brighton College in England, Mr. Murgian was also one of the
original shareholders and directors of AHL. Mr. Murgian lives in Nairobi, Kenya,
and is the owner of or an investor in a number of international businesses
ranging from real estate to transportation. Mr. Murgian has a beneficial
interest of more than 10% of Winton's share capital. This interest is held by
Samur (Jersey) Ltd and Amur (Jersey) Ltd, both of which are investment holding
companies ultimately owned by Mr. Murgian's family foundation.

Martin John Hunt, Director. Mr. Hunt, born in 1962, first became involved in
managed futures in October 1983, at which time he was employed as a trainee
trader for a CTA called Futures Fund Management Ltd. In December 1985, Mr. Hunt
left Futures Fund Management and in January 1986, he moved to Sabre Fund
Management, a UK-based CTA, as operations manager. In February 1988, he left
Sabre and joined AHL and from this time until 1991 he was responsible for
managing their trading operations and establishing a trading facility in
Switzerland. In July 1991 Mr. Hunt left AHL.

In August 1991, Mr. Hunt assumed responsibility for marketing and back office
operations at Royston Investments Ltd, which at the time was a CFTC-registered
CTA. Whilst at Royston Investments Limited, Mr. Hunt was registered with the
National Futures Association as an Associated Person and Associate Member from
October 1991. In March 1994, he left Royston and his status as an Associate
Member and Associated Person was subsequently terminated in January 1996. In
March 1994 Mr. Hunt established himself as an independent marketing and
compliance consultant to firms in the UK managed futures industry before working
at Palatinate Investment Management Limited, a London-based CTA, from August
1994 until January 1997 as Director of Marketing, Operations and Compliance.

In January 1997, David Harding recruited Mr. Hunt to handle the formation,
structuring and subsequent day-to-day running of Winton. At Winton, Mr. Hunt
supervised the company's operations as well as being directly responsible for
the firm's regulatory compliance and finance divisions until October 2010.
Whilst at Winton, Mr. Hunt has been registered with the National Futures
Association as an Associated Person, Associate Member and Principal of Winton
from January 1998.

Anthony Hamilton Daniell, Director and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Daniell,
born in 1954, spent ten years in the British Army during which time he achieved
a civil engineering degree from Bristol University. In March 1983, Mr. Daniell
began his career in the financial sector at David Allsopp and Partners, a UK
stockbroker, as an equity analyst following U.S. defense companies. He moved to
Rowe and Pitman, also a UK stockbroker, in April 1986, where he became Co-Head
of U.S. Equity Sales.

From March 1994 to December 2001, Mr. Daniell was Co-Head of Emerging Markets
and then Head of Latin American Equities. During this time, Mr. Daniell was
responsible for cash and derivative sales, trading and research. He was promoted
to Managing Director in January 1999. During the period April 1986 to December
2001, as a result of a series of mergers and acquisitions Rowe and Pitman
changed its name several times and ultimately became part of UBS Warburg.
Mr. Daniell left UBS Warburg in December 2001.

 28

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

In January 2002, he started at Eday Ltd, an FSA-registered private limited
company which marketed absolute return funds. In 2003, Winton engaged Eday Ltd
and Mr. Daniell to market its products. In October 2004, Mr. Daniell joined
Winton as Head of Global Marketing and Sales and became a director in October
2006 and Chief Executive Officer in October 2010.

Mr. Daniell has been registered with the National Futures Association as an
Associated Person of Winton since April 2005 and a Principal of Winton since
October 2006.

Matthew Beddall, Director and Chief Investment Officer. Mr. Beddall is the Chief
Investment Officer of the Trading Advisor. He graduated from the University of
Southampton with a first class honors degree in Mathematics and Computer Science
in 2001. He initially joined Winton in 2000 as a summer intern, returning after
graduation from university as a full time researcher in July 2001. Throughout
his employment with Winton, Mr. Beddall has been extensively involved in the
research process and has lead the development of much of the software that
underlies the design and running of Investment Advisor's trading strategy.
Mr. Beddall was appointed as CIO in 2008 and his responsibilities are now
principally focused on managing the investment process behind the Fund and the
oversight of a large part of the Investment Advisor's research department.
Mr. Beddall also holds an MSc in Applied Statistics from Birkbeck College
University of London which he was awarded in 2003. Mr. Beddall became registered
with the National Futures Association as a Principal of Winton on 28 January
2009 and an Associated Person of Winton on 12 February 2009.

Rajeev Patel, Director and Chief Operating Officer. Rajeev Patel graduated from
Trinity and All Saints College, Leeds with a degree in Economics and Business
Administration. Mr. Patel joined Winton in April 1997. Initially working as an
execution trader and settlements analyst, over the last 12 years Mr. Patel has
been centrally involved in Winton's trading and operations functions. He has
overseen the development and implementation of a number of automated accounting
and reconciliation processes at Winton as it has moved from external to
proprietary systems. He is currently responsible for the Operations department
covering operations IT, fund accounting and settlements. Mr. Patel was
originally registered with the SFA and was "grandfathered" into the new regime
as an FSA Approved Person in December 2001. He has been an NFA Associated Person
since May 1998 and was appointed Associate Director at Winton in April 2007 and
Chief Operating Officer in October 2010. Mr. Patel became registered with the
NFA as a principal of Winton on 9th June 2009.

Andrew Bastow, Director and General Counsel. Andrew Bastow was appointed as a
Director in October 2010. Mr. Bastow has been Winton Capital's General Counsel
since October 2005 and is responsible for spearheading Winton's increasing
engagement with regulatory bodies and lawmakers in Europe, the USA and the Far
East. He was elected to the General Council of the Alternative Investment
Management Association in September 2010 and is a member of the Hedge Fund
Lawyers Association.

Mr. Bastow is a solicitor of England and Wales and is also admitted as a
Barrister and Solicitor of the Supreme Court of Western Australia. Prior to
joining Winton he was employed by the Treasury Solicitor's Department of the
Government of the United Kingdom from March 2005 through October 2005 and, from
February 2001 through December 2004, with the State Solicitor's Office in
Western Australia where he was engaged in a wide range of practice areas
including public law, employment, regulation, prosecution and enforcement. He is
a British Chevening Scholar and holds a First Class Master of Laws degree from
the London School of Economics and Political Science as well as degrees in Law,
Arts and Economics obtained in Australia.

Overview of the Winton Diversified Trading Program

Winton's investment process is probably best understood by starting with the
founding principle and philosophy of Winton laid down by its founder David
Harding. This is the belief that robust statistical and other mathematical
research provides the richest and most reliable source of information on market
behavior. David Harding has spent the past 25+ years leading research into
market behavior and built an investment process that seeks to identify trends
and patterns.

In short, the investment process is best described as quantitative, systematic
and research-driven, which seeks to identify explanatory variables that have
some predictive power over future returns in markets within a carefully
developed risk driven process.

The investment objective is to achieve long-term capital appreciation through
compound growth. This goal is achieved by pursuing a diversified trading scheme
that does not rely upon favorable conditions in any particular market, nor on
market direction.

 29

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

The Diversified Trading Program (the "Diversified Program") seeks to combine
liquid Financial Instruments offering positive but low Sharpe ratios (meaning
that profits have been achieved with a certain level of risk) and generally low
correlations over the long term to other markets such as equities and fixed
income*. The Diversified Program employs what is traditionally known as a
"systematic" approach to trading Financial Instruments. In this context, the
term "systematic" implies that the vast majority of the trading decisions are
executed, without discretion, either electronically or by a team responsible for
the placement of orders (the "Trading Team"), based upon the instructions
generated by the Winton Computer Trading System (the "Trading System"). The
Diversified Program blends short-term trading with long-term trend following,
using multiple time frames in addition to multiple models. [*Please note that
although the Diversified Program's historic correlations have been low in
relation to major asset classes over the long-term, over shorter timeframes the
Diversified Program can be significantly correlated.]

Background of Graham and its Trading and Operational Principals

Graham was organized as a Delaware limited partnership in May 1994. The general
partner of Graham is KGT, Inc., a Delaware corporation of which Kenneth G.
Tropin is the President and sole shareholder. The limited partner of Graham is
KGT Investment Partners, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership of which KGT, Inc.
is also a general partner and in which Mr. Tropin is the principal investor.
Graham became registered as a commodity pool operator and commodity trading
advisor with the CFTC under the CEA and a member of the NFA on July 27, 1994.

Since December 2005, Graham has traded its Global Diversified Program at 150%
Leverage for the Fund. As of January 2009, this program has been renamed the
K4D-15V Program.

Graham is an investment manager that actively trades worldwide on a 24-hour
basis in the equity, fixed income, currency and commodity markets utilizing
securities, futures, forwards and other financial instruments. On behalf of the
Fund, Graham offers a quantitative global macro trading program that trades in
one or more of those markets. Graham's quantitative trading programs or models
produce trading signals on a largely automated basis when applied to market
data. Graham's investment objective is to provide clients with significant
potential for capital appreciation in both rising and falling markets during
expanding and recessionary economic cycles.

Principals

Kenneth G. Tropin is the Chairman and the founder of Graham. In May 1994, he
founded Graham and became registered as an associated person and listed as a
principal effective July 27, 1994. Mr. Tropin has developed the majority of the
firm's core trading programs and he is responsible for the overall management of
the organization, including the investment of its proprietary trading capital.

Paul Sedlack is Chief Executive Officer and the General Counsel of Graham. He
joined Graham in June 1998 and became registered as an associated person of
Graham effective November 20, 1998 and listed as a principal on August 21, 1998.
He oversees the operation of the finance and administration departments and is
also responsible for all legal and compliance matters. Mr. Sedlack received a
J.D. from Cornell Law School in 1986 and an M.B.A. in Finance in 1983 and B.S.
in Engineering in 1982 from State University of New York at Buffalo.

Robert E. Murray is the Chief Operating Officer of Graham and is responsible for
the management and oversight of client services, quantitative trading,
technology and risk management at Graham. He joined Graham in June 2003 and
became registered as an associated person and listed as a principal of Graham
effective June 27, 2003. Mr. Murray received a Bachelor's Degree in Finance from
Geneseo State University in 1983.

Pablo Calderini is the Chief Investment Officer of Graham and is responsible for
the management and oversight of the discretionary trading business at Graham. He
joined Graham in August 2010 and became registered as an associated person and
listed as a principal of Graham effective August 13, 2010. Prior to joining
Graham, Mr. Calderini worked at Deutsche Bank from June 1997 to July 2010 where
he held positions of increasing responsibility, most recently the Global Head of
Equity Proprietary Trading. Mr. Calderini commenced his career at Deutsche Bank
as Global Head of Emerging Markets. During his tenure at Deutsche Bank,
Mr. Calderini also helped manage several groups across the fixed income and
equity platforms, including the Global Credit Derivatives Team. Mr. Calderini
received a B.A. in Economics from Universidad Nacional de Rosario in 1987 and a
Masters in Economics from Universidad del Cema in 1988, each in Argentina.

Thomas P. Schneider is an Executive Vice President, and the Chief Trader of
Graham. He joined Graham in June 1994 and became registered as an associated
person of Graham effective September 12, 1994 and listed as a principal on
November 30, 1995.

 30

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

He is responsible for managing Graham's quantitative futures and foreign
exchange trade execution, including all of its core and short term quantitative
trading strategies, and developing and maintaining relationships with
independent executing brokers and futures commission merchants ("FCMs").
Mr. Schneider graduated from the University of Notre Dame in 1983 with a B.B.A.
in Finance and received his Executive M.B.A. from the University of Texas at
Austin in 1997.

Jeff Baisley, C.P.A., is the Chief Financial Officer of Graham. In March 2004 he
joined Graham as Manager of Financial Reporting and became registered as an
associated person effective March 17, 2008 and listed as a principal on April 8,
2008. He received his B.S. in accounting from Fordham University in 1991.

Fred J. Levin is the Chief Economist and a Senior Discretionary Trader of Graham
specializing in fixed income markets with particular emphasis on short-term
interest rates. He joined Graham in March 1999 and became registered as an
associated person of Graham effective December 8, 1999 and listed as a principal
on March 11, 2000. Mr. Levin received an M.A. in economics from the University
of Chicago in 1968 and a B.S. from the University of Pennsylvania, Wharton
School in 1964.

William Pertusi is the Chief Risk Officer of Graham, responsible for
identifying, monitoring and acting upon financial risks relative to financial
returns in Graham's diverse trading strategies. He became registered as an
associated person of Graham effective July 24, 2006 and listed as a principal on
November 28, 2006. Prior to joining Graham in April 2006, Mr. Pertusi held the
positions of Director and Risk Manager at SAC Capital Advisors LLC, an
investment management firm, from July 2004 to April 2006. From July 2002 to July
2004, he was employed as a Portfolio Manager at SAC specializing in Mortgage
Backed Securities. Mr. Pertusi was an associated person of SAC from June 2003 to
June 2006 and a principal from June 2003 to May 2005. Mr. Pertusi received a
B.S. in Electrical Engineering from Lehigh University in 1983, an M.B.A. from
Harvard in 1987, and an M.S. in Mathematics from Fairfield University in 2006.

Barry S. Fox is Director of Research of Graham. He became registered as an
associated person of Graham effective November 10, 2000 and listed as a
principal on November 15, 2007. Mr. Fox joined Graham in August 2000 as a
portfolio manager and developed several quantitative trading programs. In May
2005, he joined Graham's Research Department, and in October 2005 was appointed
Co-Associate Director of Research. Mr. Fox was appointed Director of Research in
April 2007. Mr. Fox received a B.S. in Business Administration from State
University of New York at Buffalo in 1986.

Isaac Finkle is Chief Legal Officer of Graham. He joined the Manger in May 2003
and became registered as an associated person of Graham effective April 16, 2004
and listed as a principal on June 5, 2007. As Chief Legal Officer, he oversees
the legal aspects related to the firm's futures activities. Mr. Finkle received
a J.D. from New York University School of Law in 1985, a Ph.D. from the
University of Pennsylvania in 1998 specializing in sociological theory, and a
B.A. with honors in philosophy from Haverford College in 1973.

Gavin Gilbert is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in fixed income
markets. He became registered as an associated person and listed as a principal
of Graham effective June 24, 2008. Prior to joining Graham in March 2008,
Mr. Gilbert was senior trader at Brevan Howard Asset Management, an investment
management firm, where he was employed from April 2004 to March 2008.

Sanjeev Gupta is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in the global
fixed income and foreign exchange markets. He became registered as an associated
person of Graham effective August 20, 2007 and listed as a principal on
October 11, 2007. Prior to joining Graham in May 2007, Mr. Gupta worked as a
Fund Manager and Senior Trader at Proxima Alfa Investments USA LLC, a commodity
trading advisor, and Vega Asset Management USA LLC, an investment management
firm, from June 2002 to April 2007. Mr. Gupta was an associated person of
Proxima from May 2004 to March 2007 and a principal from May 2004 to August 2004
and from January 2005 to November 2005. Mr. Gupta was an associated person of
Vega from October 2003 to July 2004 and from October 2005 to April 2006.
Mr. Gupta earned a Bachelor's degree from The Indian Institute of Technology in
May 1986 and an M.B.A. from The Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania
in May 1992.

Britton Holland is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in the energy
commodity markets. In March 2004, he joined Graham and became registered as an
associated person on April 6, 2005 and listed as a principal on April 27, 2005.
He

 31

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

became a Branch Office Manager effective April 23, 2008. Mr. Holland received a
B.A. in Economics in 1997 from the University of Texas in Austin, Texas.

Steven H. Jacolow is a discretionary trader of Graham specializing in global
macro markets with a focus on global foreign exchange, fixed income and equity
indices. He became registered as an associated person of Graham effective
February 15, 2007 and listed as a principal on June 5, 2007. Prior to joining
Graham in September 2006, Mr. Jacolow managed a portfolio at his investment
management firm, Aboukir Investment Management, from October 2005 through August
2006. From March 2004 through September 2005, Mr. Jacolow worked as a
proprietary trader at Deutsche Bank in New York. Mr. Jacolow received a B.A. in
Economics in 1987 and a M.B.A. in Accounting from Rutgers University in 1989.

Peter Jepsen is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in global macro
markets with a focus on fixed income and currencies. He became registered as an
associated person of Graham effective June 12, 2006 and listed as a principal
on June 22, 2006. Prior to joining Graham in March 2006, Mr. Jepsen was employed
as a portfolio manager at Exis Capital Management, an investment management
firm, in New York from March 2002 to March 2006. Mr. Jepsen graduated from
Bucknell University in June 1993 where he received his B.A. in Economics.

David E. Keelan is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in long/short
credit strategies. He became registered as an associated person and listed as a
principal of Graham effective, respectively, March 16, 2007 and May 11, 2007.
Prior to joining Graham in February 2007, Mr. Keelan was a Senior Portfolio
Manager at Exis Capital, an investment management firm, from May 2006 to January
2007 and from September 2002 to August 2005, where he ran a long/short credit
strategy. From September 2005 to April 2006, Mr. Keelan worked as a Portfolio
Manager at Millennium Partners, an investment management firm, in New York.
Mr. Keelan received a M.B.A in finance from New York University in 1995 and a
B.A. from Colgate University in 1988. Mr. Keelan received the designation
Chartered Financial Analyst in 2002.

Jon Tiktinsky is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in the U.S.
fixed income markets. He became registered as an associated person of Graham
effective May 23, 2008 and listed as a principal on May 30, 2008. Prior to
joining Graham in May 2008, Mr. Tiktinsky held positions of increasing
responsibility, including Managing Director, Head of U.S. Treasury Dealership,
at RBS Greenwich Capital, an investment bank, where he was employed from July
2004 to March 2008. For the period of April 2008, Mr. Tiktinsky was unemployed.
Mr. Tiktinsky was President and Founder of Hulls Farm Capital LLC, an investment
management firm, from February 2002 to June 2004. He was an associated person
and principal of Hulls Farm Capital LLC from August 2002 to May 2005.
Mr. Tiktinsky received his B.A. in economics from Colgate University in 1982.

Marwan Younes is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in the
commodities markets. He became registered as an associated person of Graham
effective April 18, 2008 and listed as a principal on May 1, 2008. Prior to
joining Graham in November 2007, Mr. Younes worked as an associate in the
commodities department of the investment bank Morgan Stanley in New York from
July 2006 to October 2007, where he designed foreign exchange and commodities
trading strategies and models. Before joining Morgan Stanley, Mr. Younes was on
sabbatical during June 2006. Mr. Younes attained his engineering degree in
May 2006 from École Nationale Supérieure de Techniques Avancées ("ENSTA") in
Paris, France where he was enrolled from September 2002 through May 2006. In May
2006, Mr. Younes also received his Masters of Science in Financial Engineering
from Columbia University where he was enrolled from July 2005 to May 2006.
During his enrollment at ENSTA, Mr. Younes completed a corporate internship at
the Paris, France office of the investment bank Lazard Frères where he worked as
an analyst in the Equities and Capital Markets Department from July 2004 through
June 2005.

Shannon Bass is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in capital
structure credit trading. He became registered as an associated person of Graham
effective June 1, 2009 and listed as a principal on May 14, 2010. Prior to
joining Graham in January 2009, Mr. Bass was at R3 Capital Partners, an
investment management firm, from June 2008 to January 2009, where he was a
Senior Partner and Portfolio Manager focusing on capital structure credit
trading. From November 2002 to May 2008, Mr. Bass held positions of increasing
responsibility including Managing Director at the investment bank, Lehman
Brothers, Inc. He was an associated person of Lehman Brothers, Inc. from January
2003 to May 2008. Mr. Bass received his M.B.A.

 32

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

from New York University in 1989 and his B.S. in Electrical Engineering from the
University of California, San Diego in 1986.

Melanie Lynch is Senior Economist and a discretionary trader at Graham,
specializing in fixed income markets with particular emphasis on short-term
interest rates. Ms. Lynch joined Graham in December 2001 and became registered
as an associated person of Graham effective May 30, 2002 and listed as a
principal on August 3, 2010. Ms. Lynch received her B.S. in economics from the
University of Maryland at College Park in 1989.

Rita Nagle is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in energy commodity
markets. She became registered as an associated person of Graham effective
June 29, 2010 and listed as a principal on July 1, 2010. Prior to joining Graham
in April 2010, Ms. Nagle was a Senior Trader at Bunge North America, a large
grain merchandising firm, from January 2009 to April 2010. She held the position
of Vice President of Trading at Louis Dreyfus Highbridge Energy LLC, a merchant
energy company, from November 2007 to December 2008. She was on sabbatical from
July 2007 until November 2007. From July 2005 to June 2007, Ms. Nagle was
Managing Director of Fixed Income, Energy Trading and Marketing for the
investment bank, Credit Suisse Group AG. Ms. Nagle held the position of Managing
Director in the Fixed Income, Currency and Commodities Division at the
investment bank Goldman Sachs Group Inc. where she was employed from July 1998
to July 2005. Ms. Nagle received a B.A. in Economics and Psychology from Trinity
College in 1989.

Cameron Crise is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in multi-asset
global macro markets. He became registered as an associated person of Graham
effective August 18, 2010 and listed as a principal on September 1, 2010. Prior
to joining Graham in May 2010, Mr. Crise was employed as a portfolio manager at
Nylon Capital LLP, an investment management firm, in London from April 2008 to
March 2010. He moved back to the United States in April 2010 in order to take on
the position with Graham the following month. He was between employment from
February 2008 through March 2008. Mr. Crise worked as a currency portfolio
manager at Fortis Investments, the global asset management arm of Fortis Group,
the investment bank, from August 2004 to January 2008. Mr. Crise graduated from
Duke University in 1993 where he received his B.A. in Public Policy Studies and
History.

Timothy Every is a discretionary trader of GCM, specializing in global foreign
exchange, fixed income, and equity indices. He became registered as an
associated person of Graham effective August 4, 2010 and listed as a principal
on October 1, 2010. Prior to joining Graham in April 2010, Mr. Every was a
proprietary trader and Vice President in the Foreign Exchange Division of
Citibank, an investment bank, from October 2007 to April 2010. From July 2000 to
October 2007, Mr. Every held positions of increasing responsibility including
Executive Director of U.S. Products Trading for the investment bank, Goldman
Sachs. He was an associated person of Citibank from July 2008 to April 2010 and
an associated person of Goldman Sachs from February 2001 to October 2007.
Mr. Every received a B.A. in Economics from Stanford University in June 2000.

Martin A. Brennan III is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in US
fixed income and other liquid sovereign markets. He became an Associated Person
of Graham effective May 26, 2011 and a Principal on May 27, 2011. Prior to
joining Graham in January 2011, Mr. Brennan was an original Partner and Senior
Portfolio Manager at Sailfish Capital Partners, LLC, an investment management
firm, from March 2005 to February 2007. From January 2010 to January 2011, Mr.
Brennan was between employment. Mr. Brennan received a B.A. in Accounting from
Michigan state University in June 1983.

Daren McCullough is a discretionary trader of Graham, specializing in
agricultural and energy options. Prior to joining Graham in March 2011, Mr.
McCullough was a portfolio manager at Yannix Capital, an investment management
firm, from February 2007 to March 2011. Mr. McCullough was a Senior Trader,
global Options Strategist with Louis Dreyfus Corporation, an investment
management firm, from May 2003 to January 2007. Mr. McCullough received a M.B.A.
from the University of Kansas in October 1991. Mr. McCullough received the
designation Chartered Financial Analyst in 1991.

KGT, Inc. and KGT Investment Partners, L.P. are entity principals of Graham.

Graham and its principals may, from time to time, trade futures, forwards and
option contracts and securities for their own proprietary accounts. If Graham or
its principals engage in such trading, investors will not be able to inspect
such records.

Graham and its principals do not own an Interest in the Fund.

There have been no material administrative, civil or criminal proceedings
against Graham, its affiliates, or its principals, any of which are pending, are
on appeal or have concluded at any time during the last five years.

Overview of the K4D-15V Program

The K4D-15V quantitative investment program has its origin in Graham's legacy
trend-following systems, dated as far back as 1995. Graham's trend systems are
designed to participate selectively in potential profit opportunities that can
occur during periods of price trends in a diverse number of U.S. and
international markets. The trend systems establish positions in markets where
the price action of a particular market signals the computerized systems used by
Graham that a potential trend in prices is occurring. The trend systems are
designed to analyze mathematically the recent trading characteristics of each
market and statistically compare such characteristics to the historical trading
patterns of the particular market. The trend systems also

 33

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

employ proprietary risk management and trade filter strategies that seek to
benefit from sustained price trends while reducing risk and volatility exposure.

The K4D-15V Program utilizes multiple computerized trading models and offers
broad diversification in both financial and non-financial markets, trading in
approximately 100 global markets. It is intended to generate significant returns
over time with an acceptable degree of risk and volatility. The computer models
on a daily basis analyze the recent price action, the relative strength and the
risk characteristics of each market and compare statistically the quantitative
results of this data to years of historical data on each market. In addition to
the trend system or systems at its base, the K4D-15V quantitative investment
program has added substantial other trading strategies developed by Graham's
research department. Graham believes strongly in the importance of research and
development activity and particularly in the development of new trading
strategies. As one example of such efforts, Graham has incorporated a
proprietary multi-factor leverage model within each of its trend-following
programs to adjust the program's exposure to key market sectors systematically
based on proprietary factors that assess the potential of prices to trend in the
near term. Other trading strategies developed by Graham research and added to
Graham investment programs include not only a broad array of trend systems with
varying time horizons, but also counter-trend trading systems and trading
systems that do not seek to identify or follow price trends at all. Such systems
generally are based on computerized mathematical models and rely primarily on
technical rather than fundamental information as the basis for their trading
decisions. Graham intends to add new trading strategies to its investment
programs as well as to modify the systems currently in place in such programs in
its ongoing efforts to keep pace with changing market conditions and it
anticipates that the constellation of trading strategies comprising each
investment program will continue to grow and evolve over time. The decision to
add or subtract systems or strategies from any investment program shall be at
the sole discretion of Graham. Clients will not be informed of these changes as
they occur.

The Futures Clearing Broker

UBS Securities LLC serves as futures clearing broker to Registrant. In its
capacity as futures clearing broker, UBS Securities executes and clears
Registrant's futures and options transactions and performs certain
administrative services for Registrant.

The Foreign Exchange Prime Broker

UBS AG Inc. serves as foreign exchange prime broker to Registrant. In its
capacity as foreign exchange prime broker, UBS AG clears Registrant's foreign
exchange forward transactions and performs certain administrative services for
Registrant.

The Administrator

Spectrum Global Fund Administration, L.L.C. ("Spectrum" or the "Administrator"),
a Delaware limited liability company located at 33 West Monroe - Suite 1000,
Chicago, IL, USA, 60603, and 8415 Pulsar Place Suite 400, Columbus, Ohio 43240.,
was the administrator of Registrant and provided certain administration and
accounting services pursuant to the terms of a Services Agreement with
Registrant dated as of May 23, 2007. On December 10, 2010, AlphaMetrix360, LLC
purchased the assets of Spectrum. Prior to June 1, 2011 the Administrator
referred to either AlphaMetrix360, LLC or Spectrum depending on the applicable
period discussed, See Note 9 of Registrant's 2010 Annual Report filed as an
exhibit to Registrant's Form 10-K.

Effective May 31, 2011, the Registrant replaced AlphaMetrix 360, LLC with
GlobeOp Financial Services LLC ("GlobeOp" or the "Administrator"), a Delaware
limited liability company located at 1 South Road, Harrison, NY, USA, 10528 as
administrator and AlphaMetrix 360, LLC Services Agreement with the Registrant
was terminated effective close of business on May 31, 2011.

The Administrator performs or supervises the performance of services necessary
for the operation and administration of Registrant (other than making investment
decisions), including administrative and accounting services. The Administrator
also calculates Registrant's Net Asset Value. In addition, the Administrator
maintains certain books and records of Registrant, including certain books and
records required by CFTC Rule 4.23(a), at its offices located as specified
above. "Administrator" refers to Spectrum, AlphaMetrix 360, LLC, or GlobeOp
depending on the applicable period discussed.

 34

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Fees and Expenses

Management Fee
Beginning January 1, 2010, Registrant pays to the Managing Member in advance a
monthly management fee equal to 1/12th of 6.00% (6.00% per annum) of the Net
Asset Value (defined below) of Registrant as of the beginning of the month, See
Note 3 of Registrant's 2010 Annual Report filed as an exhibit to Registrant's
Form 10-K.

"Net Asset Value" is the total assets in Registrant less total liabilities of
Registrant, each determined on the basis of accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America.

Effective January 1, 2011, Registrant pays a monthly administrative fee to
ClariTy Managed Account & Analytics Platform LLC, an affiliate of the Managing
Member, for risk management and related services with respect to monitoring the
Trading Advisors.

Trading Advisors' Fees

Registrant paid Winton a monthly management fee in arrears equal to 1/12 of
2.00% (2.00% per annum) of the assets under management of Winton at the end of
each month. Effective October 1, 2010 the Registrant entered into an amendment
to change the management fee paid to Winton. The Registrant now pays Winton a
monthly management fee in arrears equal to 1/12 of 1.50% (1.50% per annum) of
the assets under management of Winton at the end of each month. Registrant pays
Graham a monthly management fee in arrears equal to 1/12 of 2.00% (2.00% per
annum) of the assets under management of Graham at the end of each month.

Registrant pays each Winton and Graham an incentive fee equal to 20% and 22%,
respectively, of the New High Net Trading Profits (defined below) generated by
each Trading Advisor, including realized and unrealized gains and losses, as of
the close of business on the last day of each calendar quarter. The incentive
fees will be paid quarterly in arrears.

"New High Net Trading Profits" (for purposes of calculating an Trading Advisor's
incentive fees) will be computed as of the close of business of the last day of
each calendar quarter, or the Incentive Measurement Date, and will include such
profits (as outlined below) since the immediately preceding Incentive
Measurement Date (or, with respect to the first Incentive Measurement Date,
since commencement of operations of Registrant or the date the Trading Advisor
commenced trading activities for Registrant), or each an Incentive Measurement
Period. New High Net Trading Profits for any Incentive Measurement Period will
be the net profits, if any, from the Trading Advisor's trading during such
period (including (i) realized trading profit (loss) plus or minus (ii) the
change in unrealized trading profit (loss) on open positions), and will be
calculated after the determination of certain transaction costs attributable to
the Trading Advisor's trading activities and the Trading Advisor's management
fee, but before deduction of any incentive fees payable during the Incentive
Measurement Period. New High Net Trading Profits will not include interest
earned or credited on the assets allocated to the Trading Advisor.

New High Net Trading Profits will be generated only to the extent that the
cumulative New High Net Trading Profits achieved by the Trading Advisor exceed
the highest level of cumulative New High Net Trading Profits achieved by such
Trading Advisor as of a previous Incentive Measurement Date. Except as set forth
below, net losses from prior quarters must be recouped before New High Net
Trading Profits can again be generated.

If a withdrawal or distribution occurs or if the Trading Advisory Agreement is
terminated at any date that is not an Incentive Measurement Date, the date of
the withdrawal or distribution or termination will be treated as if it were an
Incentive Measurement Date. New High Net Trading Profits for an Incentive
Measurement Period shall exclude capital contributions allocated to the Trading
Advisor in an Incentive Measurement Period, distributions or redemptions paid or
payable from the Trading Advisor's account during an Incentive Measurement
Period and any loss carry-forward attributable to the Trading Advisor will be
reduced in the same proportion that the value of the assets allocated away from
the Trading Advisor comprises of the value of the assets allocated to the
Trading Advisor prior to such allocation away from the Trading Advisor). In
calculating New High Net Trading Profits, incentive fees paid for a previous
Incentive Measurement Period will not reduce cumulative New High Net Trading
Profits in subsequent periods.

 35

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Through December 31, 2009, the Trading Advisors' incentive fees were calculated
at the Member level. Beginning January 1, 2010, the Trading Advisors' incentive
fees have been calculated at the Registrant level. The Managing Member has
determined that any difference in each Member's loss carryforward in Registrant
as of December 31, 2009 was immaterial. As such, to reduce administrative costs,
the Managing Member determined to allocate the loss carryforward equally based
on each Member's pro rata interest in Registrant as of December 31, 2009.

Brokerage Commissions and Fees

Registrant pays to the clearing brokers all brokerage commissions, including
applicable exchange fees, NFA fees, give-up fees, pit brokerage fees and other
transaction related fees and expenses charged in connection with Registrant's
trading activities. On average, total charges paid to the clearing brokers are
expected to be less than $10.00 per round-turn trade, although the clearing
broker's brokerage commissions and trading fees will be determined on a
contract-by-contract basis. The exact amount of such brokerage commissions and
trading fees to be incurred is impossible to estimate and will vary based upon a
number of factors including the trading frequency of each advisor, the types of
instruments traded, transaction sizes, degree of leverage employed and
transaction rates in effect from time to time.

Routine Operational, Administrative and Other Ordinary Expenses

Registrant pays all of its routine operational, administrative and other
ordinary expenses, including, but not limited to, (i) legal, bookkeeping,
accounting, custodial, administration (including, without limitation, the costs
and expenses of the Administrator), auditing, tax preparation charges and
related charges of the Registrant (including reimbursement of the Managing
Member on a reasonable time-spent basis, for certain legal, accounting,
administrative and registrar and transfer agent work performed by certain of the
Managing Member's personnel for and on behalf of the Registrant), as well as
printing and other related expenses, (ii) investment related expenses,
including, but not limited to brokerage commissions, "bid-ask" spreads,
mark-ups, margin interest and other transactional charges and clearing fees, as
well as banking, sales and purchase commissions and charges and exchange fees,
fees and charges of other custodians and clearing agencies, interest and
commitment fees on loans and debit balances, income taxes, withholding taxes,
transfer taxes and other governmental charges and duties, and other
transactional charges and clearing fees incurred by the Trading Advisor on
behalf of Registrant, Registrant's pro rata share of the expenses of any Access
Fund into which it invests, and any due diligence expenses incurred in selecting
and monitoring the Trading Advisor and any Access Funds, (iii) operational and
overhead expenses of Registrant, including but not limited to, photocopying,
postage, and telephone expenses, (iv) preparation of monthly, quarterly, annual
and other reports required by applicable Federal and state regulatory
authorities, (v) Registrant meetings and preparing, printing and mailing of
proxy statements and reports to Members, (vi) client relations and services, and
(vii) computer equipment, system maintenance and other technology-related
expenses.

Extraordinary Fees and Expenses

Registrant pays all its extraordinary fees and expenses, if any, and its
allocable portion of all extraordinary fees and expenses of Registrant
generally, if any, as determined by the Managing Member. Extraordinary fees and
expenses are fees and expenses that are non-recurring and unusual in nature,
such as legal claims and liabilities and litigation costs and any permitted
indemnification payments related thereto. Extraordinary fees and expenses shall
also include material expenses that are not currently anticipated obligations of
Registrant or of managed futures funds in general, such as the payment of
partnership taxes or governmental fees associated with payment of such taxes.
Routine operational, administrative and other ordinary expenses will not be
deemed extraordinary expenses. Any fees and expenses imposed on Registrant due
to the status of an individual shall be paid by such individual or Registrant,
not the Managing Member.

Expense Cap

Beginning January 1, 2010, brokerage commissions and fees, routine operational,
administrative and other ordinary expenses, other than the Managing Member's
management fee, the fees to be paid to the Registrant's Trading Advisor(s) and
extraordinary fees and expenses, are limited to 1.50% of average Net Asset Value
per annum, See Note 3 of Registrant's 2010 Annual Report filed as an exhibit to
Registrant's Form 10-K. In the event fees and expenses for such items exceed
such amount, the Managing Member will pay such amounts.

 36

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Redemption Charge

There is no redemption charge in respect of Interests.

Competition

Registrant competes with other private and publicly offered commodity pools, as
well as other alternative investments such as REITs and oil and gas limited
partnerships and hedge funds. Registrant operates in a competitive environment
in which it faces several forms of competition, including, without limitation:

 • Registrant competes with other commodity pools and other investment
 vehicles for investors.

 • The Trading Advisor may compete with other traders in the markets in
 establishing or liquidating positions on behalf of Registrant.

Employees

Registrant has no employees. Management and administrative services for
Registrant are performed by the Managing Member or third parties pursuant to the
LLC Operating Agreement, as further discussed in Notes 3 and 4 of Registrant's
financial statements included in its annual report for the year ended
December 31, 2010 ("Registrant's 2010 Annual Report"), which is filed as an
exhibit to Registrant's Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010.

Critical Accounting Policies

Preparation of the financial statements and related disclosures in compliance
with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America
("U.S. GAAP") requires the application of appropriate accounting rules and
guidance. Applying these policies requires the Managing Member to make
judgments, estimates and assumptions in connection with the preparation of
Registrant's financial statements. Actual results may differ from the estimates
used.

The Managing Member has evaluated Registrant's financial statements and related
disclosures and has determined that the policies discussed below are critical
accounting policies because they involve estimates, judgments and assumptions
that are particularly complex, subjective or uncertain. For further discussion
of Registrant's significant accounting policies, see Note 2 of Registrant's 2010
Annual Report filed as an exhibit to Registrant's Form 10-K.

The valuation of Registrant's investments that are not traded on a United States
("U.S.") or internationally recognized futures exchange is a critical accounting
policy. The market values of futures (exchange traded) contracts is verified by
Registrant's administrator, which obtains valuation data from third party data
providers such as Bloomberg, Reuters and Super Derivatives and compares those
prices with Registrant's clearing broker. The market value of currency swap and
forward (non-exchange traded) contracts is extrapolated on a forward basis from
the spot prices quoted as of 4 p.m. on the last business day of the reporting
period. All values assigned by the administrator and confirmed by the Managing
Member are final and conclusive as to all of Registrant's Members. As such, if
actual results vary from estimates used, they are not anticipated to have a
material impact on the financial statements and related disclosures.

Registrant records all investments at fair value in its financial statements,
with changes in fair value reported as a component of Trading Profits (Losses)
in the Condensed Statements of Operations. Generally, fair values are based on
quoted market prices; however, in certain circumstances, significant judgments
and estimates are involved in determining fair value in the absence of an active
market closing price. Registrant considers prices for exchange traded commodity
futures and options contracts to be based on quoted prices in active markets for
identical assets (Level 1). The values of forwards, swaps, and certain option
contracts for which market quotations are not readily available are priced by
LME, CME, and ICE exchanges, as well as Super Derivatives, Bloomberg, Reuters
and or other third party data providers who derive fair values for those assets
from observable inputs (Level 2). Level 3 inputs reflect Registrant's
assumptions that it believes market participants would use in pricing the asset
or liability. Registrant develops Level 3 inputs based on the best information
available in the circumstances, which may include indirect correlation to a
market value, combinations of market values or Registrant's proprietary data.
Level 3 inputs generally include information derived through extrapolation or
interpolation of observable market data. Registrant does not currently have any
investments valued using Level 3 inputs.

 37

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Of the Registrant's investments at June 30, 2011, $26,140,268 or 99.89% of
Registrant's investments are classified as Level 1 and $28,282 or 0.11% as Level
2. Of the Registrant's investments at December 31, 2010, $23,095,206 or 99.10%
of Registrant's investments are classified as Level 1 and $209,049 or 0.90% as
Level 2. There are no Level 3 investments at June 30, 2011 or December 31, 2010.

The Managing Member has determined that it is in the best interest of the
Registrant to invest a portion of non-margin assets, either directly or
indirectly through certain investment funds which invest primarily in (i) U.S.
government securities (which include any security issued or guaranteed as to
principal or interest by the United States), (ii) any certificate of deposit for
any of the foregoing, including U.S. treasury bonds, U.S. treasury bills and
issues of agencies of the United States government, (iii) corporate bonds or
notes, or (iv) other instruments permitted by applicable rules and regulations.
At the end of each month, the Managing Member will be paid 1/12 of 50% (a 50%
annual rate) of the first 1% of the returns earned on its investment of
non-margin assets. Registrant will be credited with all additional returns
earned on Registrants investment of non-margin assets.

In January 2010, the FASB amended the existing disclosure guidance on fair value
measurements, which was effective for Registrant on January 1, 2010, except for
disclosures about purchases, sales, issuances, and settlements in the roll
forward of activity in Level 3 fair value measurements, which is effective for
Registrant on January 1, 2011. Among other things, the updated guidance requires
additional disclosure for the amounts of significant transfers in and out of
Level 1 and Level 2 measurements and requires certain Level 3 disclosures on a
gross basis. Additionally, the updates amend existing guidance to require a
greater level of disaggregated information and more robust disclosures about
valuation techniques and inputs to fair value measurements. Since the amended
guidance requires only additional disclosures, the adoption of the provisions
effective January 1, 2011 will not impact the Registrant's financial position or
results of operations. The implementation of this guidance did not have a
material impact on the Registrant's financial statements.

Liquidity and Capital Resources

Registrant commenced operations on January 1, 2007. Contributions were raised
and redemptions paid through new members' investments in and redemptions out of
the aggregate trading vehicle through December 31, 2009. Beginning
January 1, 2010, individual members may redeem from the direct investment
vehicle. Interests in Registrant may be redeemed on a monthly basis.

Subscriptions and Redemptions

Second Quarter 2011

Subscriptions of Interests for the Second Quarter 2011 were $0. Redemptions of
Interests for the Second Quarter 2011 were $1,494,326.

Second Quarter 2010

Subscriptions of Interests for the Second Quarter 2010 were $0. Redemptions of
Interests for the Second Quarter 2010 were $544,471.

Liquidity

A portion of Registrant's net assets has been held in cash, which was used as
margin for trading in commodities. In as much as the sole business of Registrant
is to trade in commodities, Registrant continues to own such liquid assets to be
used as margin. The clearing broker and bank credit Registrant with interest
income on 100% of its average daily equity maintained in its accounts with the
clearing broker and bank during each month at competitive interest rates.

The commodities contracts may be subject to periods of illiquidity because of
market conditions, regulatory considerations and other reasons. For example,
commodity exchanges limit fluctuations in certain commodity futures contract
prices during a single day by regulations referred to as "daily limits." During
a single day, no trades may be executed at prices beyond the daily limit. Once
the price of a futures contract for a particular commodity has increased or
decreased by an amount equal to the daily limit, positions in the commodity can
neither be taken nor liquidated unless traders are willing to effect trades at
or within the limit. Commodity futures prices have occasionally moved the daily
limit for several consecutive days with little or no trading. Such market
conditions could prevent the Registrant from promptly liquidating its commodity
futures positions.

 38

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Since Registrant's business is to trade futures, forward and options contracts,
its capital is at risk due to changes in the value of these contracts (market
risk) or the inability of counterparties to perform under the terms of the
contracts (credit risk). Registrant's exposure to market risk is influenced by a
number of factors including the volatility of interest rates and foreign
currency exchange rates, the liquidity of the markets in which the contracts are
traded and the relationships among the contracts held. The inherent uncertainty
of Registrant's speculative trading as well as the development of drastic market
occurrences could result in losses considerably beyond Registrant's experience
to date and could ultimately lead to a loss of all or substantially all of
investors' capital. The Managing Member attempts to minimize these risks by
requiring Registrant and the Trading Advisor to abide by various trading
limitations and policies, which include limiting margin amounts, trading only in
liquid markets and permitting the use of stop loss provisions. See Note 8 of
Registrant's 2010 Annual Report for a further discussion on the credit and
market risks associated with Registrant's futures, forwards and option
contracts.

There are no known material trends, demands, commitments, events or
uncertainties at the present time that are reasonably likely to result in
Registrant's liquidity increasing or decreasing in a material way.

Capital Resources

Registrant does not intend to raise additional capital through the sale of
Interests offered or through any borrowing. Due to the nature of Registrant's
business, Registrant does not contemplate making capital expenditures.
Registrant does not have, nor does it expect to have, any capital assets.
Redemptions, exchanges, and sales of Interests in the future will affect the
amount of funds available for investments in futures interests in subsequent
periods. It is not possible to estimate the amount, and therefore the impact, of
future inflows and outflows of Interests. There are no known material trends,
favorable or unfavorable, that would affect, nor any expected material changes
to, Registrant's capital resource arrangements at the present time.

Market Overview

Following is a market overview for Second Quarter 2011 and Second Quarter 2010:

Second Quarter 2011

The Second Quarter of 2011 was volatile in the financial markets, although risk
assets ended the quarter not too far from where they began. The early part of
the quarter saw the global economy carrying the momentum from the first quarter.
However, the last two months of the quarter were marked by a slew of generally
disappointing economic data from around the world. While political tensions in
the Middle East and North Africa faded from the headlines, markets were roiled
by another episode of the unfolding Eurozone drama. Toward the end of the
quarter, an 11th hour bailout of Greece sparked a powerful rally in equities. US
GDP growth decelerated in the first quarter to a disappointing 1.9% annual rate.
To date, the data released for the second quarter indicate no reacceleration in
the GDP growth. Moreover, the hopes for a robust increase in employment that
were spurred by the first quarter's rise in hiring activity were belied, as job
growth fizzled and the unemployment rate climbed back above the 9% mark. The
housing market remained in the doldrums. However, oil prices fell toward the end
of the quarter, providing relief for consumers and stoked hopes of acceleration
in consumer spending in the second half.

Interest Rates: Treasuries rallied across the curve as confidence in the
economic recovery faltered and concerns about Eurozone fueled safe haven demand.
The 10-year yield decreased by 29 basis points to end the quarter at 3.18%. At
one point in the quarter, the 10-year yield had fallen well below the 3% level
for the first time since November 2010. The 30-year yield also declined, by 13
basis points. The 5-year note rallied even more, with the yield falling by 48
basis points. Thus, the yield curve from the 5 year to the 30 year steepened.
However, the short-end of the curve flattened as the 2-year yield fell only by
35 basis points. The Fed kept rates unchanged throughout the quarter and
acknowledged that the economy and the labor markets had underperformed
expectations. The ECB was the most hawkish, raising interest rates in April and
becoming the first among the major central banks to do so in the recovery. The
BOE continued to be divided over elevated inflation but the fragile and stalling
economy prevented any action. The Bank of Japan kept key rates unchanged
throughout the quarter as well.

Currencies: The greenback's slide contoured in the quarter, although the rate of
decline stabilized. The Dollar Index dropped 2.1% falling to its lowest level
since 2008. Notwithstanding the continued troubles over sovereign debt, the euro
ended the quarter up 2.4% against the dollar. The British pound, on the other,
hand was flat during the quarter, reflecting the BOE's dovish stance. The Swiss
franc surged 8.1%, climbing to a new record level against the dollar as the
spate of European deposits fleeing to Switzerland boosted the franc. The
Japanese yen appreciated 2.6% as the economy appeared to be putting the
earthquake behind. The Australian and the Canadian dollar continued to rally,
rising 3.6% and 0.8%, respectively.

 39

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Indices: After three consecutive quarterly gains, the rally in US equities
paused in the second quarter, although the Dow managed to eke out a gain of 0.8%
for the quarter. The performance across the sectors was mixed. Utilities and
transportation posted solid gains while the S&P® Financial Index slipped over
6%. The S&P 500® and NASDAQ® edged down approximately 0.4% and 0.3%,
respectively, for the quarter. European stocks outperformed US equities as well
as global equities. The STOXX 600, a broad measure of European equities, gained
1.0%, in dollar terms. The CAC edged down 0.2% while the FTSE 100® and DAX®
closed the quarter with gains of approximately 0.6% and 4.8%, respectively.
Asian markets were mixed. Japan bounced back from the earthquake induced drop of
the previous quarter and the Nikkei climbed up 0.6%. However, the Hang Seng fell
4.8% and the Korean Kospi® edged down 0.3%. The Australian All Ordinaries Index
declined 5.5%.

Energies: Commodities slipped for the first time in four quarters as Middle East
tensions eased, crop acreage and inventories turned out higher and fears of a
hard landing in China gained some credence. While much of the commodity complex
declined during the quarter, sugar, gold and copper were the notable exceptions.
Crude fell 13.0% during the quarter and heating oil declined 7.0%. Gasoline
bucked the trend, rising 1.5%. Natural gas slipped further, declining 1.2%, as
the market remained oversupplied.

Metals: Silver ended the quarter down 7.8% but not before getting close to the
$50/oz mark. Gold continued its steady climb breaching the $1500 mark and
gaining 5.2% for the quarter. Base metals were mixed. While copper recorded a
gain of 0.5%, aluminum, nickel and zinc experienced losses of 3.8%, 8.5%, and
1.1%, respectively.

Agriculturals /Softs and Grains: Grains suffered from the strong USDA report
showing acreage and inventories well above analysts' expectations. Wheat plunged
27.2%. Corn and soybeans fell 15.0% and 5.7%, respectively. Cotton corrected
from its all time high, declining 14.1%. The softs complex went against the
trend in the broader agricultural complex, with sugar, coffee and cocoa all
recording gains.

Second Quarter 2010

The Second Quarter of 2010 jolted the global financial markets. The economy took
a backseat as the escalating sovereign debt problems in some Eurozone countries,
questions about the European banking system and renewed misgivings about the
ultimate fate of the euro dominated the financial markets. Economic data was
simply not strong enough to overcome the negative influence of European
developments. The tone of economic data deteriorated during the quarter.
Consumer spending failed to follow up on that of the robust first quarter. After
starting the quarter on a bright note, private payroll employment slipped back
to a disappointing pace. Other labor market indicators also appeared to be
stalling.

Commodities had a mixed quarter, which was surprising given the broad based risk
aversion. While industrial commodities were hurt by the fears surrounding global
growth prospects, agricultural commodities rallied thanks to strong emerging
market demand and the unusually hot, dry weather.

Interest Rates: With all the stars lining up, global financial turmoil,
disappointing U.S. growth and the renewed threat of deflation, U.S. Treasury
bonds had their best quarter since the fourth quarter of 2008. Yields dropped
below the 3% level for the first time since April 2009. The Federal Reserve kept
policy unchanged throughout the quarter and there were no indications of
imminent change in interest rate policy. The major Federal Reserve actions
during the quarter were the reestablishment of the temporary dollar liquidity
swaps with various central banks in order to contain the fallout from the
Eurozone crisis. The European Central Bank, the Bank of England and the Bank of
Japan kept key rates unchanged throughout the quarter as well. The Reserve Bank
of Australia continued its rate hike cycle that began late in 2009 as the
economy and labor markets strengthened on the back of strong demand for
commodities from its Asian trading partners.

Currencies: The U.S. dollar rally that began in December 2009 reached a
crescendo in the second quarter. In addition to the euro's weakness, the dollar
was buoyed by global risk aversion and flight to quality in the second quarter.
The U.S. Dollar Index gained approximately 6.2%, and climbed above 86 for the
first time since April 2009. The dollar appreciated smartly against the euro as
the storm clouds quickly spread from Greece to engulf Portugal, Spain and
Ireland and threatened the very future of the European Monetary Union. The euro
finished the second quarter down approximately 9.1% against the dollar. The
British pound fared better, declining 1.6% in the second quarter against the
greenback. The Japanese yen not surprisingly rallied with the rising global risk
aversion, gaining 5.8% against the dollar. The two currencies heavily influenced
by commodities, the Australian and Canadian dollars, fell sharply despite solid
economic data. The Australian and Canadian dollars dropped 7.5% and 4.4%,
respectively, against the U.S. dollar.

 40

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Indices: The strongest equity rally since the 1930s hit a brick wall in the
second quarter as stock prices suffered their first quarterly decline since the
first quarter of 2009. Unlike in the first quarter, robust earnings were not
enough to overcome the Eurozone jitters and growing fears of sovereign debt
crisis around the developed world. The losses were broad-based across most
sectors. The Dow Jones Industrial Average, S&P 500 and NASDAQ fell approximately
9.9%, 11.9% and 12.0%, respectively, for the quarter. European stocks, weighed
down by problems in Greece, lagged U.S. equities, although the German markets
were an exception. The STOXX 600, a broad measure of European equities, declined
approximately 16.4%, in dollar terms, although in euro terms it showed a smaller
loss of 7.7%. The CAC, FTSE 100 and DAX closed the quarter with losses of
approximately 13.4%, 13.4% and 3.1%, respectively. Asian markets were more mixed
as the Nikkei fell 15.4% and the Hang Seng declined 5.2%, the Korean Kospi edged
up 0.3%. The Australian All Ordinaries Index posted an 11.6% decline.

Energies: Crude oil fell 10.9% on the back of macro risk aversion and softening
freight data. Natural gas soared 13.0%, reflecting the fact that at current
prices it is an attractive substitute for other energy products. Heating oil
ended the quarter with an approximate 10.6% loss. Reformulated gasoline followed
crude and heating oil and declined 11.3% in the quarter.

Metals: Gold registered a solid 10.7% gain during the quarter. Although the
dollar remains the preferred safe haven, the euro's troubles appear to have
supported gold. The international community's desire to diversify their reserves
may be helping gold given the euro and the sterling's weakness. Silver lagged
gold, rising 4.4%, but the performance was surprising given that base metals,
which often have a strong correlation to silver, fell steeply. Copper, aluminum
and nickel ended the quarter with declines of 17.9%, 15.9%, and 21.2%,
respectively.

Agriculturals /Softs and Grains: Agricultural commodities generally gained
during the quarter. Coffee led the way with a 19.5% surge on the back of weak
harvests in Vietnam and Central America. Sugar rebounded back from a steep
plunge in the previous quarter, rising 8.0%. Grains managed modest gains as the
macro environment weighed against generally supportive fundamentals.

Sector Performance

Due to the nature of Registrant's trading activities, a period-to-period
comparison of its trading results is not meaningful. However, set forth below
are the following:

 (a) the major sectors to which Registrant's assets were allocated as of
 the Second Quarter 2011 and 2010, measured as a percentage of the
 "gross speculator margin" (i.e., the minimum amount of cash or
 marginable securities a speculator must post when buying or selling
 futures assets); and

 (b) a discussion of Registrant's trading results for the major sectors in
 which Registrant traded for the Second Quarter 2011 and 2010.

Second Quarter 2011

As of June 30, 2011, the allocation of Registrant's assets to major sectors was
as follows:

 Sector Allocation
 Currencies 40.35 %

 Energies 13.10 %

 Grains 6.44 %

 Indices 13.90 %

 Interest Rates 18.78 %

 Meats 0.27 %

 Metals 5.64 %

 Tropicals 1.52 %

 TOTAL 100.00 %

 41
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Trading results for the major sectors in which Registrant traded for Second
Quarter 2011 were as follows:

Currencies: (+) Registrant experienced the majority of its gains in the
Australian dollar and Swiss franc. The majority of its losses were incurred in
the Japanese yen and Columbian peso.

Energies: (-) Registrant experienced the majority of its losses in crude,
heating oil and natural gas.

Grains: (-) Registrant experienced gains in wheat. The majority of its losses
were incurred in cotton and soybeans.

Indices: (-) Registrant experienced gains in the DAX® and the CAC. The majority
of its losses were incurred in the DJ STOXX®, the Hang Seng and the Tokyo Stock
Index.

Interest Rates: (-) Registrant experienced the majority of its gains in the
London gilt and Treasury Notes. The majority of its losses were incurred in the
German Bund and the Euribor.

Meats: (-) Registrant experienced the majority of its losses in live cattle.
Gains were realized in live hogs.

Metals: (+) Registrant experienced the majority of its gains in gold and silver.
Losses were realized in aluminum, copper and zinc.

Softs: (-) Registrant experienced the majority of its losses in cocoa and
coffee.

Second Quarter 2010

As of June 30, 2010, the allocation of Registrant's assets to major sectors was
as follows:

 Sector Allocation
 Currencies 28.01 %

 Energies 5.88 %

 Grains 6.13 %

 Indices 9.68 %

 Interest Rates 39.08 %

 Meats 0.50 %

 Metals 8.97 %

 Tropicals 1.75 %

 TOTAL 100.00 %

Trading results for the major sectors in which Registrant traded for Second
Quarter 2010 were as follows:

Currencies: (+) Registrant experienced a majority of its gains in the Japanese
yen, British pound and euro. The majority of losses were experienced in the
Australian, Canadian and New Zealand dollars, Mexican peso and Swiss franc.

Energies: (-) Registrant experienced losses in brent crude, crude oil, gas oil,
reformulated gasoline and heating oil.

Grains: (-) Registrant experienced gains in corn. The majority of its losses
were incurred in bean oil, cotton, wheat, soybean meal and soybeans

Indices: (-) Registrant experienced losses in the S&P 500, DJ Stoxx 50, CAC 40,
DAX, FTSE, Nasdaq and Nikkei.

 42

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Interest Rates: (+) Registrant experienced a majority of its gains in US
Treasuries, Short Sterling, Eurodollar, Euribor Liffe, German Bonds, Bund and
Bobl and Japanese Government Bonds. The majority of losses were experienced in
Australian and Canadian Bonds.

Meats: (-) Registrant experienced losses in live hogs and cattle.

Metals: (-) Registrant experienced gains in gold and silver. Losses were
realized in zinc, nickel, copper and aluminum.

Softs: (-) Registrant experienced losses in sugar, coffee and cocoa.

Results of Operations

Second Quarter 2011

The Net Asset Value of Registrant as of June 30, 2011 was $31,284,701, a
decrease of $2,685,323 from the March 31, 2011 Net Asset Value of $33,970,024.
Registrant's average net asset level during the Second Quarter 2011 was
approximately $33,234,000. Registrant's average net assets during the Second
Quarter 2011 in comparison to the Second Quarter 2010 increased by approximately
$11,052,000, primarily due to additions from Member Series E and Member KGT
during 2010 which more than offset the effects of redemptions.

Registrant's performance for the Second Quarter 2011 was (3.67)%. Performance
includes the percentage change in Registrant's Net Asset Value excluding the
effect of any subscriptions and redemptions and includes the percentage impact
of trading gains/(losses) less any commissions and related fees and expenses.
Past performance is not necessarily indicative of future results.

Registrant's trading losses before commissions and related fees for the Second
Quarter 2011 were approximately $(435,000).

Dividend income for the Second Quarter 2011 was approximately $134,000, an
increase of approximately $134,000, as compared to the Second Quarter 2010, as
the Registrant started earning dividend income on the investment of non-margin
assets in investment funds starting October 2010. For a further discussion of
these investments, see Note 4 of Registrant's 2010 Annual Report, which is filed
as an exhibit to Registrant's Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2010.

Commissions and other transaction fees for the Second Quarter 2011 were
approximately $50,000, an increase of approximately $42,000 as compared to the
Second Quarter 2010, primarily due to increased average net asset levels
described above.

Trading Advisors' management fees for the Second Quarter 2011 were approximately
$146,000, an increase of approximately $34,000 as compared to the Second Quarter
2010, primarily due to increased average net asset levels described above.

Management Fees to the Managing Member for the Second Quarter 2011 were
approximately $216,000, a decrease of approximately $118,000 as compared to the
Second Quarter 2010, primarily due to the change in service fee structure as
discussed in Note 6 of Registrant's Condensed Financial Statements, attached
herein.

Incentive fees are based on the "New High Net Trading Profits" generated by the
Trading Advisors, as defined in the trading advisory Agreements between
Registrant and the Trading Advisors. Incentive fees for the Second Quarter 2011
were $225.

ClariTy Managed Account fees for the Second Quarter 2011 were approximately
$21,000, an increase of approximately $21,000 as compared to the Second Quarter
2010, as the Registrant started paying a fee to ClariTy Managed Account &
Analytics Platform LLC, an affiliate of the Managing Member, in January
2011. For a further discussion of this fee, see Note 9 of Registrant's 2010
Annual Report, which is filed as an exhibit to Registrant's Form 10-K for the
fiscal year ended December 31, 2010.

 43

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Service Fees for the Second Quarter 2011 were approximately $293,000, an
increase of approximately $293,000 as compared to the Second Quarter 2010,
primarily due to the change in fee structure discussed in Note 6 of Registrant's
Condensed Financial Statements, attached herein.

Managing Member fees earned on investment funds for the Second Quarter 2011 were
approximately $29,000, an increase of approximately $29,000 as compared to the
Second Quarter 2010, as the Managing Member started earning a fee on the return
of the investment of non-margin assets in January 2011. For a further discussion
of this fee, see Note 9 of Registrant's 2010 Annual Report, which is filed as an
exhibit to Registrant's Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010.

Operating expenses include accounting, audit, tax, and legal fees. Operating
expenses for the Second Quarter 2011 were approximately $91,000.

Second Quarter 2010

The Net Asset Value of Registrant as of June 30, 2010 was $21,933,399, a
decrease of $459,846 from the March 31, 2010 Net Asset Value of $22,393,245.
Registrant's average net asset level during the Second Quarter 2010 was
approximately $22,182,000. Registrant's average net assets during the Second
Quarter 2010 in comparison to the Second Quarter 2009 decreased by approximately
$3,313,000 primarily due to the net effect of redemptions.

Registrant's performance for the Second Quarter 2010 was 0.38%. Performance
includes the percentage change in Registrant's Net Asset Value excluding the
effect of any subscriptions and redemptions and includes the percentage impact
of trading gains/(losses) less any commissions and related fees and expenses.
Past performance is not necessarily indicative of future results.

Registrant's trading gains before commissions and related fees for the Second
Quarter 2010 were approximately $611,000.

Commissions and other transaction fees for the Second Quarter 2010 were
approximately $8,000, a decrease of approximately $4,000 as compared to the
Second Quarter 2009, primarily due to the decrease in the average net asset
levels discussed above.

Trading Advisor Management Fees for the Second Quarter 2010 were approximately
$112,000, a decrease of approximately $42,000 as compared to the Second Quarter
2009, primarily due to the decrease in the average net asset levels discussed
above.

Management Fees for the Second Quarter 2010 were approximately $334,000, an
increase of approximately $334,000 as compared to the Second Quarter 2009
primarily due to the change in structure discussed above. See Note 1 and Note 3
of the Registrants 2009 Annual Report for a further discussion of the change in
structure.

During the Second Quarter 2010 no incentive fees were earned, as the fund's
incentive fee calculation did not exceed the previous high water mark on which
the trading advisor was paid an incentive fee.

Operating expenses include accounting, audit, tax, and legal fees. Operating
expenses for the Second Quarter 2010 were approximately $133,000.

Inflation

Inflation has had no material impact on the operations or on the financial
condition of Registrant from inception through June 30, 2011.

Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements and Contractual Obligations

Registrant does not have any off-balance-sheet arrangements (as defined in
Regulation S-K 303(a)(4)(ii)) that have or are reasonably likely to have a
current or future effect on its financial condition, changes in financial
condition, revenues or expenses, results of operations, liquidity, capital
expenditures or capital resources that is material to investors.

Registrant's contractual obligations are with the Managing Member, the Trading
Advisor and its commodity broker. Management fees payable by Registrant to the
Trading Advisor and commencing January 1, 2010, management fees to the

 44

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 Table of Contents

Managing Member, are calculated as a fixed percentage of Registrant's Net Asset
Value. Incentive fees payable by the Registrant to the Trading Advisor are at a
fixed rate, calculated as a percentage of Registrant's "New High Net Trading
Profits" (as defined in the Advisory Agreement). As such, the Managing Member
cannot anticipate the amounts to be paid for future periods as Net Asset Values
and "New High Net Trading Profits" are not known until a future date.
Commissions payable to Registrant's commodity broker are based on a cost per
executed trade and, as such, the Managing Member cannot anticipate the amount
that will be required under the brokerage agreement, as the level of executed
trades are not known until a future date. These agreements are effective for
one-year terms, renewable automatically for additional one-year terms unless
terminated. Additionally, these agreements may be terminated by either party
thereto for various reasons. Additionally, since the Registrant does not enter
into other long-term debt obligations, capital lease obligations, operating
lease obligations or other long-term liabilities that would otherwise be
reflected on the Registrant's Statements of Financial Condition, therefore a
table of contractual obligations has not been presented. For a further
discussion of Registrant's contractual obligations, see Notes 1, 3 and 4 to
Registrant's 2010 Annual Report filed as an exhibit to Registrant's Form 10-K.

[ Back To Real Time Communications's Homepage ]





Home









  Subscribe here for RTCW eNews  



















































LLC Operating Agreement, LLC Operating Contracts - Free Legal Documents (page 1 Of 137)

















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > LLC Operating Agreement    

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents













SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>




 Legal professionals use RealDealDocs to gather competitive intelligence, draft documents and to find specific information about transactions within a particular industry or sector, and you can too. These are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their clients. You can view sample LLC operating contracts or download LLC operating agreements from RealDealDocs. We have thousands of sample LLC operating agreements, and millions of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free. Finding relevant agreements to use in your own work no longer has to be difficult, confusing or expensive. The many sample LLC operating agreements from RealDealDocs have been drafted by top law firms from across the United States and around the world, and they can save you or your company valuable time and money when you need a reliable LLC operating contract or template in a hurry. Benefit from the work of those that have gone before you, and leverage the efforts and thinking of the best lawyers from the top law firms and Fortune 500 companies, without all the hassle or expense. Download LLC operating agreements from RealDealDocs today for the quick and easy way to use millions of legal agreements and clauses from top law firms across the US and around the world to your advantage. To view any of the sample LLC operating contracts below, simply click on its title. For advanced search click here. 



LLC Operating Agreements 





	These LLC Operating Agreements are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their clients. Use them for competitive intelligence, drafting documents or to get information about transactions within a particular industry or sector. We have millions of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free.	



1) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OPERATING AGREEMENTParties: TRILINC GLOBAL IMPACT FUND LLC | TRILINC ADVISORS, LLC | TRILINC GLOBAL IMPACT FUND, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
2) THE SIXTH AMENDED AND RESTATED OPERATING AND MEMBER CONTROL AGREEMENT OF GRANITE FALLS ENERGY, LLCParties: GRANITE FALLS ENERGY, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/29/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Minnesota
3) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF SPARTAN MERGER SUB 2, LLCParties: SURGICAL CARE AFFILIATES, INC. | Spartan Merger Sub 2, LLC | UNITEDHEALTH GROUP INCORPORATED 
								
								Document Date: 3/24/2017

4) AMENDMENT NO. 2 TO FIFTH AMENDED AND RESTATED LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF CENTENNIAL RESOURCE PRODUCTION, LLCParties: CENTENNIAL RESOURCE DEVELOPMENT, INC. | Centennial Resource Development, Inc | CENTENNIAL RESOURCE PRODUCTION, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
5) OPERATING AGREEMENT OF GK SERVICES, LLCParties: GK SERVICES INC | Cintas Corporation | GK Services, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/22/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Minnesota
6) AMENDMENT NO. 4 TO THE AMENDED AND RESTATED LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF SHEPHERD'S FINANCE, LLC AUTHORIZING SERIES C CUMULATIVE REDEEMABLE PREFERRED UNITSParties: SHEPHERD'S FINANCE, LLC | Investor's Mark Acquisitions, LLC | SK Funding, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/21/2017

7) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OPERATING AGREEMENT OF LAGOON LLCParties: WESTLAKE MANAGEMENT SERVICES, INC. | Lagoon LLC | Westlake Chemical Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
8) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF WESTLAKE NG V LLCParties: WESTLAKE CHEMICAL INVESTMENTS, INC. | WESTECH BUILDING PRODUCTS, INC | WESTLAKE NG V LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
9) AMENDMENT TO LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: WESTLAKE MANAGEMENT SERVICES, INC. | Westlake Building Products, Inc | Westlake NG V LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
10) FIRST AMENDMENT TO LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF WESTLAKE STYRENE LLCParties: WESTLAKE CHEMICAL INVESTMENTS, INC. | Westlake Chemical Holdings, Inc | Westlake Chemical Investments, Inc | Westlake Olefins Corporation | WESTLAKE STYRENE LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
11) FIRST AMENDMENT TO LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF WESTLAKE STYRENE LLCParties: WESTLAKE MANAGEMENT SERVICES, INC. | Westlake Chemical Holdings, Inc | Westlake Chemical Investments, Inc | Westlake Olefins Corporation | WESTLAKE STYRENE LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
12) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OPERATING AGREEMENT OF LAGOON LLCParties: WESTLAKE CHEMICAL INVESTMENTS, INC. | Lagoon LLC | Westlake Chemical Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
13) AMENDMENT TO LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: WESTLAKE CHEMICAL INVESTMENTS, INC. | Westlake Building Products, Inc | Westlake NG V LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
14) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENT OF WESTLAKE NG V LLCParties: WESTLAKE MANAGEMENT SERVICES, INC. | WESTECH BUILDING PRODUCTS, INC | WESTLAKE NG V LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
15) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY COMMUNITIES CONSTRUCTION, LLC, a Utah limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES CONSTRUCTION, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | UTAH REVISED UNIFORM LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

16) OPERATING AGREEMENTParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES SOUTHEAST, LLC | Its Manager, CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
17) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT OBSERVATORY HEIGHTS , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | OBSERVATORY HEIGHTS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
18) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR WESTOWN CONDOMINIUMS , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | WESTOWN CONDOMINIUMS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
19) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR B, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | AVR B, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
20) Limited Liability Company Agreement of Donnelley Financial, LLCParties: DONNELLEY FINANCIAL SOLUTIONS, INC. | DF LLC | Donnelley Financial, LLC | R R Donnelley  Sons Company 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
21) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR A, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
22) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR HOMETOWN SOUTH , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | HOMETOWN SOUTH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
23) AMENDED  RESTATED OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR WESTOWN TOWNHOMES , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | WESTOWN TOWNHOMES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
24) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR THE RETREAT AT RIDGEGATE LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | RIDGEGATE, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
25) OPERATING AGREEMENTParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | UTAH REVISED LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY | UTAH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

26) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR A, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
27) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT STERLING RANCH, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | STERLING RANCH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
28) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR C, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | AVR C, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
29) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR C, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | AVR C, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
30) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT LANDMARK , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | LANDMARK, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
31) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT CLAREMONT RANCH, LLC a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | CLAREMONT RANCH, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
32) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY COMMUNITIES CONSTRUCTION, LLC, a Utah limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES CONSTRUCTION, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | UTAH REVISED UNIFORM LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

33) AMENDED  RESTATED OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR WESTOWN TOWNHOMES , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | WESTOWN TOWNHOMES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
34) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR AVR B, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | AVR B, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
35) OPERATING AGREEMENTParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | UTAH REVISED LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY | UTAH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

36) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT CLAREMONT RANCH, LLC a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | CLAREMONT RANCH, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
37) OPERATING AGREEMENT OF CENTURY COMMUNITIES OF UTAH, LLCParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | Century Communities, Inc | Utah Revised Uniform Limited Liability Company | UTAH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

38) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT LANDMARK , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | LANDMARK, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
39) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT OBSERVATORY HEIGHTS , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | OBSERVATORY HEIGHTS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
40) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR THE RETREAT AT RIDGEGATE LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | RIDGEGATE, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
41) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR WESTOWN CONDOMINIUMS , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | WESTOWN CONDOMINIUMS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
42) OPERATING AGREEMENT OF CENTURY COMMUNITIES OF UTAH, LLCParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | Century Communities, Inc | Utah Revised Uniform Limited Liability Company | UTAH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

43) OPERATING AGREEMENTParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES SOUTHEAST, LLC | Its Manager, CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
44) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR CENTURY AT STERLING RANCH, LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: CENTRAL PARK ROWHOMES, LLC | CENTURY LAND HOLDINGS, LLC | HORIZON BUILDING SERVICES, LLC | STERLING RANCH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
45) OPERATING AGREEMENT FOR HOMETOWN SOUTH , LLC, a Colorado limited liability companyParties: RESERVE AT HIGHPOINTE ESTATES, LLC | CENTURY COMMUNITIES, INC | HOMETOWN SOUTH, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
46) Burlington Northern Santa Fe, LLC UNDERWRITING AGREEMENT March 6, 2017Parties: BURLINGTON NORTHERN SANTA FE, LLC | JP Morgan Securities LLC | Morgan Stanley  Co LLC | Wells Fargo Securities, LLC 
								Law Firm: Cravath Swaine;Baker Botts
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
47) MRC P ERMIAN LKE C OMPANY , LLC LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM DELAWARE, LLC | LONGWOOD GATHERING AND DISPOSAL SYSTEMS GP, INC | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems, LP | MRC Permian LKE Company, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
48) LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM HOLDINGS , LLC COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM SOUTH TEXAS, LLC | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems GP, Inc | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems, LP | LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM HOLDINGS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
49) MRC P ERMIAN LKE C OMPANY , LLC LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM HOLDINGS, LLC | LONGWOOD GATHERING AND DISPOSAL SYSTEMS GP, INC | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems, LP | MRC Permian LKE Company, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
50) LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM HOLDINGS , LLC COMPANY AGREEMENTParties: LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM DELAWARE, LLC | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems GP, Inc | Longwood Gathering and Disposal Systems, LP | LONGWOOD MIDSTREAM HOLDINGS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
 




Browse by StateGo directly to a specific page of results:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839404142434445464748495051525354555657585960616263646566676869707172737475767778798081828384858687888990919293949596979899100101102103104105106107108109110111112113114115116117118119120121122123124125126127128129130131132133134135136137 
 
 

 












